Is there a way to punish him?
to avoid such a thing from happening again
Or how long will it take for the restaurant to be ready? Can you help me ask that?
Zhejiang University's graduation ceremony students sang the lead, and the research results made people's brains wide open - Xinhua News Agency
Washing hands with air, using the breath to judge diseases, and precisely searching for the source of smog yesterday evening, a series of brain-opening academic achievements were awarded at the opening ceremony of the 2016 Academic Conference of Zhejiang University.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and the research covers many fields such as environment, machinery, energy, medicine, life science, humanities education, and so on. Students started from a curious point, and created many high-end inventions with practical value, some of which have won awards both at home and abroad.
Bio-sensors: Your family doctor
A team of doctoral students from the School of Biomedical Engineering demonstrated a bio-sensor on a smartphone, which is only half the size of a smartphone.
"All you need to do is take a few breaths, and the device can detect your body's health status from the components of your exhaled breath. "
Zhang Di Ming introduced that this set of sensors is connected to the smart phone, and the health report will be displayed on the phone after the gas is released.
Smart wristbands that can detect health conditions on the market generally detect temperature, pulse and other physical parameters.
And this set of biological sensors uses graphene, a new material, as its target, which is sensitive to chemical elements and can more deeply and accurately reflect the health condition of the body.
Smart surgical lights: doctors' high-powered eyes
In addition to smart phones, the operating room also used smart surgical lights.
The invention won a silver medal at the 44th Swiss Geneva International Invention Fair this year.
Zhu Linjing and Shen Junfei from the School of Optoelectronics and Engineering of China University of Mining and Technology opened a new idea in the defects of traditional surgical lights, and invented the intelligent LED surgical shadowless light.
"Many diseases can be detected and cured in the early stages, and the light used in the doctor's operating room is related to this. "
Shen Junfei said that if doctors cannot see all the tumor tissues in the early stage of cancer, the cancer cells will spread.
The smart surgical light has four light discs, which can be adjusted to enhance the contrast of different tissues under light.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity and transparency of the light at any time according to the needs of the operation and personal habits.
This intelligent surgical light has been used in the affiliated hospitals of Zhejiang University School of Medicine, such as the Affiliated Hospital of Zhejiang University School of Medicine and the Affiliated Children's Hospital of Zhejiang University School of Medicine, and has received good feedback.
In October last year, this invention won the first prize of the National Challenge Cup.
Air-washing hands: save water and cool
Normal people wash their hands with water, at most with a little soap, and squeeze a little hand wash liquid. Li Qizhang and his classmates invented a "air washing device".
As soon as we stand on the device's wash basin, our weight will compress the air.
"It's like a firecracker.
The compressed air forms a fluid at the faucet and combines with the water.
That way we can get our hands clean!"
The color reaction and the bacterial residue prove that the effect of this method of washing is the same as that of ordinary washing.
This device only needs our own gravity as a driving force, which can ensure the degree of cleaning and save 90% of water, and the whole process is completely energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, this invention won the only gold medal in many top universities in the world at the Second Global Major Challenge Summit.
Please arrange to refund me as soon as possible, thx
Please cancel the order and return the cash, don't accumulate points, and don't use #PRS_ORG# in the future!
Bones and spicy pickled vegetables are not suitable for children to eat
If so, please order as soon as possible.
No, thank you
He called me and told me where he was #PRS_ORG#
I didn't wait, I cancelled the order
I bought #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
Well, that's a bummer
A certificate that is of great significance - the first aid certificate
This is one of the certificates I feel is important apart from my driver's license!
To popularize: First aid measures are actually emergency rescue measures in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is well known that the time between the accident and the arrival of the ambulance is actually a period of time, and it is this period of time that is the most important.
This is the time when emergency rescue is needed.
If I really did have a heart attack, stroke, or respiratory arrest, our window of life would be four minutes, golden four minutes!
So it's important to know that help is just a phone call away!
When someone falls down around us, we can use professional knowledge to rescue him, instead of standing still and doing nothing, which is so terrifying.
"In China, we have 300,000 unexpected deaths every year, and the most dangerous is sudden cardiac arrest.
In the United States, it is an average of 15%.
In Las Vegas, 78 percent of people who gambled were able to recover, while in Shanghai and Beijing, it was less than 1 percent."
This is what founder Lu Le said.
If one person has a heart attack, stops breathing, and stops their heart, there's nothing you can do.
Only by artificial respiration and chest compression can a person be saved.
I found that we are not very aware of this kind of awareness to learn first aid, but when things happen, it is too late. So I still call on everyone to learn this skill, so that we can respond in time when faced with emergencies.
Maybe it could save one person's life!
First aid certificates can be obtained at the local Red Cross training center, and students also get discounts.
PS: The last picture is a record of the goals I set for myself before the age of 25, and adding the first aid certificate to the list was a few months ago, but it was actually completed!
Then I went to take other certificates I wanted to take, and I planned to take a diving certificate. I saw that there was a diving first aid certificate on Little Red Book. I had to have a first aid certificate to take the certificate. So the first aid certificate is still very useful!
I ordered #NUMBER#.
There is only one shrimp dumpling for 13 yuan!?
I haven't tried it
How is #NAME not clear?
For $13?
Yesterday #PRS_ORG# missed the delivery of food, but this time I got a shrimp dumpling to eat!
Because I saw that the code I entered was valid before.
To begin with, I think "The Four Seas" is a bad movie in all aspects.
But if you say this movie is not a highlight, then it is not at least the soundtrack is pretty good.
There are many kinds of bad movies, and one that makes you fall asleep in the movie theater is one of them, and one that makes you feel indignant after watching is another. "Four Seas" is like a monkey on the Emei Mountain, it can use countless ways to ignite your anger.
In this regard, Han Han is truly gifted.
The most painful thing about this film is that it seems to be a creature in a sci-fi novel, and it is difficult to describe it, and it is like the coat on Xiao Ma's body.
Even after watching it, you will wonder if there is any hidden meaning in it, but when you think about it carefully, it is just a bunch of crap.
To begin with, I find it difficult to understand some of the plots.
His hometown should be a small island in the south, and he lives with his grandmother.
Her grandmother has a wish to see snow, and then the plot arranged for a neighbor to drive a small bread van to take her to the northeast to see snow.
Elderly people sit in a van from the south to the north to see snow?
He and his dad were also very comfortable with it.
Then the old man stopped writing.
How did the female captain of the abandoned ship get a business license?
Why can the scooter gang on the island easily block a section of mountain road?
Then the truck that was delivering steel bars stopped in the middle of the road, and all the truck drivers couldn't find it.
That's too obvious of a prop.
Why would a rogue, with a criminal record, become a police officer?
Why didn't the police report the high-interest loans? The police even specially asked if there were any difficulties?
An adult knows how to use a smartphone, but doesn't know how to use a hotel card to open the door, and then forcibly arrange the boss of the hotel to sleep outside the room?
The random plot twists are everywhere in the film, so much so that when I recall them, I feel pain.
Besides the plot, the movie's theme, or lack thereof, is just a mess.
At the beginning of the film, you thought it was going to be a comedy, but after 20 minutes, you guessed that it might be a motivational film, and after watching half of it, you thought it might be a story about the survival of young people in a small town, and after watching it, you didn't know what you were watching, and then you began to doubt yourself deeply - why did you go to the movie theater to watch a fart?
For most people, it is actually very familiar with the plot of all kinds of movies, such as you want to shoot a motorcycle racer, then you have to work hard + comedy and tell the audience a talented rookie how to step by step towards success.
If you want to make a love movie, then you have to be honest and tell the grudge between the small town youth and the waitress.
If you want to reflect reality, then at least your plot cannot contain things that are contrary to the normal world.
(For example, the new motorcycle that Yin Zheng played was burned, but he could still sing the role, which can't go to some places because of the incurable brain disease).
As for the heroine, Mingming, who is not mentally retarded in some aspects, I don't know if it is due to the actress's acting skills or the director's requirements.
There's one thing I don't understand, though, and that's why Han Hakan, as a race car driver, is so fond of adding car crash scenes to his own movies.
Such a movie arrangement is in the Spring Festival, is it to give the audience a headache?
Application: Taida Value Encoder Battery Box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The size of the battery box is as follows:
The related products of A2 series are as follows:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O connection line CN1 terminal bracket brake resistor
Small power encoder cable, large power encoder cable, small power power line, large power power line.
Small power line, large power line, encoder and power plug, servo battery box
1. Our store cooperates with the courier company.
1）Cooperation with Wanwan is based on the signature of Wangwang!
2）SF Express
2. Buyers need the products urgently or have time-limited offers, it is suggested to choose Shunfeng Express, it is suggested to pay in advance, and Shunfeng Express has some guarantee, and then pay after the freight is modified.
3. Buyers have questions about the shipping fee charged by the store, and they can choose to pay the extra shipping fee.
4. Heavy-duty products are generally shipped out, and further contact should be made.
1. Our store supports 7-day return and exchange service. Due to the problems of product quality and quantity, the store bears the freight.
2. The quality problem of the product itself, due to the buyer's selection of the wrong model and other factors, need to be returned and exchanged, without affecting the function of the product itself and without affecting the secondary sales, the store supports free return and exchange service, and the round-trip freight needs to be borne by the buyer.
3. The store does not support the delay of delivery to cause the need to return the goods, and the seller is responsible for the freight demand.
4. Customized products are not eligible for return or exchange.
1. Is this the original product?
Answer: Unbranded products that are not marked with the original factory brand are replaced with domestic substitutes.
2. Do you have fakes?
Answer: Sorry, our store does not sell fake products. The so-called fake products have the same logo and packaging as the original products.
3. Are domestic xxx products produced in China?
Answer: Domestic products are substitutes for imported products, and products produced in China by the original factory are only used domestically.
Professional provides domestic servo, PLC connection cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories, mainly including servo encoder, power cable, control connector, power aviation plug, terminal board and cable, lithium battery, PLC program download line, connection line, etc. Brake resistor, local bus, wire cable, all accessories are strictly in accordance with the standard of Mitsubishi, and professional engineers do it.
And adopt servomotor and PLC actual test to ensure the quality and durability of the products for customers.
Welcome to inquire!
The factory direct sales, welcome to wholesale!
Other lengths are available and can be customized.
For related customized products, please contact the stores!
If we just waive the order minimum for you, what does that mean?
Can I?
I received it, but all three drinks spilled out.
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well: The introduction of Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a professional manufacturer of concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well block machinery, inspection well wall and wall module machinery, from semi-automatic to fully automatic production line.
Through years of practice and development, it has now acquired high quality and main production of hydraulic, mobile and fully automatic check-hole series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the concrete module production and processing equipment in the well: Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well, and the characteristics and advantages of Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
Yixin checks that the brick machine equipment is widely applicable to the new type of building materials for civil engineering such as coal, heat, water, electricity, gas and so on.
Such as drainage, water storage facilities, various inspection wells, rainwater outlets, square pits, sewage pits and small constructions, bridge wing walls and so on.
The advantages of using concrete modules to build inspection wells are that the top, bottom, left and right sides of the modules are all concave and convex grooves, and the modules are combined to form a chain lock.
The shear strength of the wall body is far superior to that of the plain masonry.
The module is a hollow structure, and the vertical and horizontal holes are connected after the combination of masonry. After the core of the hole is poured with concrete, it forms a network structure of reinforced and waterproof concrete, which plays the role of secondary reinforcement and waterproofing.
Modules are equipped with socket holes in both horizontal and vertical directions, and the overall strength of the structure is improved by increasing the number of socket holes in the horizontal direction and the vertical direction.
In addition, the check dams and drainage wells built by the concrete check dam module are difficult to collapse, sink, leak, and other phenomena, and the mechanical performance of the wall and tank module is stable, and the operation is simple and standardized.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine device is equipped with data input and output devices, and a one-key touch-screen liquid crystal display monitor the whole process of mechanical operation to realize the ideal human-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical hydraulic system of the wall body module uses a single-cylinder hydraulic system for conveying and a double-cylinder hydraulic system for conveying.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoided the impact of host vibration on the hydraulic system and ensured the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete check well module brick machine equipment cloth box moving module box up and down, the storage box door closed, the automatic transport trolley, all of which are completed independently by the hydraulic system, so as to reduce the wear and tear and maintenance of the mechanical equipment.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment adopts imported computers, electrical appliances, sealing parts, and pressure parts, and the overall performance is stable and reliable.
The mechanical excitation platform of the wall body module adopts the whole steel plate, and the line cut ratio of the platform is no welding point, which makes the filling box free to move and guide, and fully reduces the mechanical wear.
Reduce the load of the mold, fill the filler and encrypt the amplitude of the two-in-one, and use the integrated, all-synchronous, and the vibration of the table and the mold to ensure that the real effect is achieved.
The mechanical vibration of the wall body module is adjusted according to the price of the raw material to adjust the amplitude, without wear and tear, thereby prolonging the service life and reducing the cost.
The wall body module has dual functions of automatic and manual control.
Check the mold:
The inspection of the water-saving bricks of Yixin brick machine:
The corner of the Yixin company's workshop:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules
Zhengzhou wall brick module equipment can not only produce check bricks, but also produce various standard bricks, hollow bricks, and road flower bricks.
Delivery in person:
The trial of modern apprenticeships in Chongqing middle school is to become an enterprise apprentice-Xinhua News Agency
Yesterday, the reporter learned from the city education committee that this year, my city will pilot the "modern apprentice" talent training model in 60 vocational secondary schools. At the same time, the students accepted into the pilot will have apprentice status, and will be pre-enrolled as employees of the pilot enterprises after enrollment.
The municipal education department requires that the enrollment and recruitment of junior middle schools and enterprises be standardized, and the dual identity of junior middle school students and part-time employees be clearly defined, and a three-party agreement be signed between the apprentice, the guardian, the junior middle school, and the enterprise according to the principle of mutual selection. For apprentices who are 16 years old but not yet 18 years old, a three-party agreement must be signed between the apprentice, the guardian, the school, and the enterprise to determine the specific posts, teaching content, and rights and responsibilities of each party, and to determine the specific posts, teaching content, and rights and responsibilities of each party.
Encourage pilot schools to adopt the modern apprentice system and cooperate with enterprises to carry out pre-employment and transfer training for enterprise employees.
The pilot schools should reform the talent cultivation model.
The school and the enterprise jointly design the talent training plan, jointly formulate the professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, master standards, quality monitoring standards and relevant implementation plans.
The pilot aims to cultivate a one-year internship cycle, and the internship time of students in enterprises is determined according to the professional talent training plan, and the top-level internship generally lasts for 6 months.
In the implementation of enterprise class management, according to the characteristics of different professions, one master can lead 2 to 5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that students master the skills required for each workstation.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, my city determined 60 city-level modern apprentice training pilot projects in three batches, and the number of people in each pilot project was about 50 people, and a total of about 3000 students (apprentices) were trained.
According to the principle of first testing and then implementing, from the point to the face, gradually promote the establishment of the long-term mechanism of school-enterprise joint enrollment, joint training and integrated education, and effectively improve the students' job skills and employment rate and employment quality.
My app says it has been delivered, but I haven't received it
Just called an Uber, I don't know if it was left on the doorstep
Then call back.
I live in Shau Kei Wan, why did the order come to Hoi King Garden?
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and in the end it was decided to cut the grass. The effect of dust removal is good, and the dust in the house is significantly reduced. However, the single-handed operation is a bit heavy; the wet mop needs to be improved, and there will be traces of dust when going back and forth. Overall, it is very satisfactory.
The cooking machine is very heavy, and it looks very high-end, which is suitable for me, a kitchen novice, and the children say that it is better than I can cook, and they have done two meat and two vegetarian dishes, and the sweet and sour pork is particularly delicious, and the time is long, and the other uses are very short, and the noise is very small, and there is no need to worry about frying the porridge, and there is no need to worry about not knowing how to do it!
After receiving the goods, I was so eager to cook that I cooked three dishes in the middle of the day. Technology has changed life, and the control of heat and seasoning is precise, and the taste of the dish has directly upgraded to the level of a chef. Good, for those who are not good at cooking, it is a godsend, and I recommend that you buy it!
I added a new member to the kitchen.
The smart cooking machine can automatically control the temperature and stir-fry.
No more fear of being burned by hot oil, no more fear of overcooking and burning vegetables.
The stir-fried food was more delicious than what I made, and the tomato fried eggs were especially flavorful, and the eggs had a special taste.
This pot is a good buy.
It's good and worth buying, and it's very good.
Overall, it was very good, very clear, and consistent with the description.
Worth having.
The customer service was also very good.
The screen is large, clear, and the eyes are not tired, and no other abnormalities have been found.
Compared with the mainstream display, it is thicker, and the border is a little wider, and the gap between the border and the screen is a little big, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
The delivery is fast!
The service attitude of the merchants is good!
After a while, the quality was good, and the screen resolution was also very clear.
The stock market is very good, 1/4 is too perfect
The delivery was fast, the things were good, and the second machine I bought was indeed a good thing. The picture quality is high, and it is not distorted because of the large screen, and the interface is complete.
The impression is good, the colors are restored well, and the quality is good!
China Children's Center will hold a series of activities to let children "high-tech" through "June 1" - China News Service
On May 20, 2019, the reporter from Xinhua News Agency, Huang Xiaoxi and Zhou Shanshan learned from the China Children's Center that from May 28 to June 1, the China Children's Center will hold a series of activities such as children's innovation experience, children's visual art festival, and parent-child book fair, so that children can spend "Children's Day" in the charm of science and technology.
It is understood that the China Children's Center will hold activities during the Children's Day of this year, including the Children's Future Learning Carnival of "Love Home and Create Cool", the First Children's Visual Art Festival, the "Bookworm Carnival", and the "Family Love Reading" series of activities.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, introduced that the "Love Home, Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival is the focus of the China Children's Center's celebration of Children's Day this year.
The activities focus on organically combining social innovation and family personal creativity, and through the participation of children and families to experience various innovation education activities, so that innovation practice becomes a cultural gene of the whole family, and "doing things" becomes a new way of learning and living for the whole family.
It is reported that the “Love Home Create Cool” Children’s Future Learning Carnival will include dozens of cutting-edge science and technology experience contents such as the “Bean Fruit Maker” experience activity, the anniversary celebration of the “Old Cow Children’s Exploration Hall” and the “Exploration of Family Love and Children’s Love on June 1”, the VR public experience plan, and the “Maker Tribe” interactive workshop.
Five-spice meat fried rice turned into pickled five-spice meat fried rice
Will it be another $100 or $200 to use?
It's worrying that it will take so long to complete
Okay, I'll help you.
Is that the same guy who gave me a ride?
Can you help me follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been cooking for half an hour
But no rider took the food away.
South African doctor: Omicron's transmission power is strong, but most are mild
Many South African doctors and medical experts believe that the new coronavirus variant is less severe than the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to Reuters, with the spread of the omicron variant in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in the province of KwaZulu-Natal reported that the symptoms of the new coronavirus patients they treated were relatively mild, such as body pain and cough similar to flu.
Dr. Unben Pillay, the director of the organisation, said that he sees around 100 patients a day, but none of them need to be admitted.
"They can control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days. "
He said this includes elderly patients and those with health problems, who are more likely to fall seriously ill from the coronavirus.
He said that compared to the previous Delta outbreak, the patients he treated for COVID-19 had "difficulty breathing and low oxygen levels.
Many people will have to stay in the hospital for several days."
Two weeks after the first report of the omicron variant in southern Africa, other doctors have also shared similar experiences.
While it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors have observed some early signs.
According to the South African National Institute of Communicable Diseases, only 30% of the hospitalized COVID-19 patients in recent weeks are severe cases, which is half of the proportion of severe cases in the first wave of the epidemic; the average hospitalization time has been shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; and only 3% of the recent COVID-19 patients have died, while the mortality rate in the early cases in South Africa was as high as 20%.
Dr. Willem Hanekom, director of the Africa Health Research Institute, cited data from the National Institute of Communicable Diseases and other reports to say: "At the moment, all the indications are that it is a mild disease."
He also said, "Now is still early, we need to get the late data.
In normal circumstances, the time between hospitalization and death is later, and we only have two weeks to enter this wave of epidemics. ”
At the same time, scientists around the world are observing the number of cases and hospitalization rates, while testing the effectiveness of the current vaccines and treatment methods.
While Delta remains the world's main coronavirus strain, cases of the Omicron variant are appearing in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicenter of the outbreak.
According to the health official, the number of new cases in the first week of December in Hong Kong increased by 400%, and the test showed that more than 90% of the cases were the omicron variant.
Thanks to all the supporters today, 80 boxes have been sent out!
The ingredients of the beauty and skin care soup:
The function of white fungus: sweet and bland, lung, stomach and kidney meridians; it has the effects of strengthening the essence, nourishing the kidney, soothing the intestines, nourishing the stomach, replenishing qi and blood, and nourishing the heart; it can be used to treat diseases such as lung heat and cough, lung dryness and dry cough, women's irregular menstruation, gastritis, constipation and other diseases; it is a good supplement for patients who are not susceptible to warm and hot and who are deficient in yin and yang.
The function of plum gum: bitter, neutral, enter the large intestine and bladder meridians.
Effects: With blood, lymph, and diarrhea, it can also be used to relieve pain, and can also be used to replenish water and lubricate the intestines. If there are people with constipation, they can eat more dates.
The function of wolfberry: sexual balance, sweet taste, liver and stomach meridian.
It benefits the liver and eyes, nourishes the liver and kidneys, whitens the skin and nourishes the body, replenishes the deficiency and prolongs life.
The function of red dates: sweet, neutral, and beneficial to the spleen and stomach. It has the functions of replenishing the spleen and stomach, nourishing the qi and replenishing the blood, and calming the mind. If the spleen and stomach are weak, and the qi and blood are insufficient, it is recommended to take more red dates.
The function of Longan meat: sweet and warm, nourishing the heart and spleen, and suitable for those who are deficient in both the heart and spleen.
Dragon's eye meat can moisturize the skin and beautify the skin, nourish the blood and calm the mind, replenish the heart and spleen, and strengthen the yang and invigorate the qi. People with anemia can also take it. People with insomnia can also take it.
The function of lotus: sweet and bitter, neutral, heart, spleen and kidney meridians.
Calm the mind, relieve insomnia, weak stomach, forgetfulness, heart palpitations, thirst and hunger, nourish and replenish the deficiency.
Therefore, this beauty soup is not only a dessert, but also a health tonic!
Eating more can make you feel better!
And it won't cost as much as a bird's nest, and it won't make your pockets burst!
The food is already cold, and the food may spoil
Order #NUMBER# was originally scheduled to be delivered at 18:40, but was changed to 19:15 after one change!
Dinner time is limited, please handle it quickly!
I haven't received it
How can it be completed in 5 minutes after ordering?
The actual discount code details are where to see
Education Times: What can we do to save the children who have been kidnapped?
If we compare the famous public service advertisement saying "If you don't buy, you don't kill", then in a good environment with no demand for "kidnapping", group prevention and control, and the general public's anti-kidnapping, the crime of kidnapping will become unprofitable, risky, and costly. This kind of crime will not happen again and again.
Recently, the Criminal Investigation Department of the Public Security Bureau has launched an emergency release platform for missing children information.
This is an internet information platform created to establish an authoritative channel for the release of missing children information and to find missing children in a timely manner.
When I heard the name of this app, I felt very warm.
The new technology methods are not only called “art” and full of sentiment, but also well applied in informationization, which is practical and effective.
The first priority of the anti-kidnapping law enforcement is to find the children who have been kidnapped and protect their safety and freedom.
The second is the trial and punishment of the suspect.
The meaning of criminal punishment can be listed as individual punishment, social prevention, and legal education.
However, before the sale of the case is broken, it is necessary to pay attention to the safety of the victim.
Matters of great urgency, such as whether or not it is appropriate to impose the death penalty on children who have been trafficked, can be put aside for the time being, and can be discussed carefully; but the issue of rescuing children who have been trafficked cannot be ignored.
According to the experience of handling such cases, human traffickers tend to leave the scene as soon as possible after getting their hands on the money.
The search for the missing child can be delayed for a minute, and the difficulty of solving the case will increase by one step.
In this case, taking direct measures such as the "Tuan Yuan" platform, which helps to crack cases and find missing children, is a practical action.
After all, "kidnapping" is a big task that requires the whole legal system to work.
To combat crime, protect the rights and interests of children and parents, from the improvement of the law, to the protection of the law, and from the meticulousness of the law enforcement, there is no need to neglect the care of “protecting the weak and helping the poor”.
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking from the family to the society can also be done better.
For example, a common scenario is that a family of three is resting at a train station, and the parents are asleep, only to find that the child is missing when they wake up.
It is not possible to expect a two-year-old to have sufficient self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have some awareness of protection.
Both parents take turns to rest, or put the child in a safe place, which is one of the most basic means to prevent children from being abducted.
From the police's crackdown on child trafficking, both sides of buying and selling trafficked children should also be paid attention to and punished.
A single bad act is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Criminal Law of China, the minimum penalty for the crime of trafficking in children is five years in prison; if the crime is particularly serious, it can be sentenced to death, and the property can be confiscated.
The higher the crime point and the heavier the punishment, the more likely it is that the crime of trafficking in children will be regarded as a more serious crime under the trend of “lightening the punishment”.
There are still many cases of kidnapping occurring every year.
It is apparent that some people have outdated ideas about raising children, and their legal awareness is low.
The legal education of this part of people should be synchronized.
To effectively control the trafficking of persons, it is not enough to rely solely on official strict enforcement.
If the "market" of kidnapping exists widely, the kidnappers are greedy for profit and constantly innovate the methods of kidnapping, which will form the situation of "fighting" with the law enforcement officers, and the anti-kidnapping action is bound to fall into the low-efficiency pit.
Therefore, breaking the backward concept, popularizing legal knowledge, also helps to cure the crime of child trafficking and buying and selling.
Yang Haodong delivered the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress and the Provincial Party Congress
Drawing inspiration from the Party’s centennial struggle history
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2020 (Full-media reporter Gong Baowei) According to the unified arrangement of the Provincial Committee, on December 10, at 9:00 am, the Standing Committee of the Provincial Committee and the Propaganda Department of the Provincial Committee, Yang Haodong, Secretary of the Propaganda Department of the Provincial Committee, made an interactive lecture at the video and art creation park in Maolan Mountain. He deeply studied and implemented the spirit of the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, the spirit of the important instructions of General Secretary Xi Jinping, and the spirit of the 12th Provincial Party Congress.
Yang Haodong expounded on the core meaning and practical requirements of the spirit of the congress from the three aspects of idealism, purpose and mission, self-revolution and youth party, and the leadership of the party and the theory of the party.
He pointed out that we should learn the spirit of the all-conference and the important instructions of Xi Jinping on the important speeches of the Hunan Provincial Party Congress, and integrate the spirit of the all-conference and the spirit of the provincial party congress, so as to strengthen the ideological self-consciousness, political self-consciousness and action self-consciousness, and firmly move forward along the direction pointed out by Xi Jinping.
In the interactive exchange session, grassroots cadres, enterprise representatives and youth representatives asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of “two established”, how to grasp the guiding role of cultural enterprises, and how to draw strength from the century-long history of the party in the new era. Yang Haodong answered one by one with simple language and vivid examples. He hoped that the young party members would draw strength from the century-long struggle of the party, tightly unite around the central leadership, and remain loyal to the party.
The number of graduates from colleges and universities in Beijing in 2022 is expected to reach 2.68 million - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11 (Yang Na) On December 11, the reporter learned from the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau that the number of graduates of Beijing colleges and universities in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
Relevant officials from the Beijing Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that they will deploy the employment work of Beijing University graduates in the aspects of strengthening the matching of supply and demand, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring difficult assistance, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
It is learned that the Beijing Human Resources and Social Security Bureau will set up a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact the 40 job experience bases of graduates from 40 universities and colleges, visit the recruitment units, integrate the demand information and the job information, and focus on the “six-one ” , that is, to recruit one batch of enterprises, to recruit one batch of state-owned enterprises, to recruit one batch of projects, to recruit one batch of enlisting into the army, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment trainees, to recruit one batch of employment
In fact, I don't know if the store made a mistake or the rider made a mistake.
No receipts on the bag
No trace to be found
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time was 30 minutes faster than the display
Thank you
Yes, a new rider has taken over.
He's been waiting for a long time.
The restaurant has been saying all along that it's working through it.
It's been a couple of hours.
The International Olive Council divides olive oil into two categories: virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil) and refined olive oil (lampante olive oil or refined olive oil) and five grades.
Virgin olive oil, or extra virgin olive oil, is the oil extracted from fresh olive fruit, mechanically cold-pressed, filtered, and processed to remove impurities.
According to the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil (EVOO): is the highest grade, highest quality olive oil, a pure natural product.
The taste is excellent, with a delicate and pleasant plant fragrance, and the acidity is no more than 1%.
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): slightly acidic, but no more than 2%, pure and aromatic.
Ordinary Virgin Olive Oil (Ordinary Virgin Olive Oil): The taste and flavor are acceptable, and the acidity is no more than 3.3%.
Refining refined olive oil is olive oil obtained after refining olive oil with an acidity of more than 3.3%, or becoming "secondary oil".
Refined olive oil can be divided into two levels:
Extra virgin olive oil (EVOO): Refined olive oil is mixed with a certain proportion of virgin olive oil to balance the taste and color. Its acidity is below 1.5%, and it has a transparent golden yellow color.
Refined olive-pomace oil or olive-pomace oil (Refined Olive-Pomace Oil): is obtained by extracting and refining the olive pomace from the oil residue.
If you have seen the grading system, you should have noticed that the acidity of olive oil is a very important indicator.
The olive fruit is like the grape used to make wine, coming from different regions and different varieties of olive fruit, which will produce different grades of olive oil.
The best growing conditions for oil palm are:
The coastal areas of the Mediterranean have the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of oil palm, such as temperature, sunlight, air humidity and rainfall.
Apart from the Mediterranean coast, other areas can only be sporadically planted in suitable areas.
The main production area and the place of production (Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, etc. are also similar to its climate.
The month of the harvest of olive oil:
The period from March to June is the time when the olive tree flowers and bears fruit. The fruit begins to develop and mature from July to October, and the fruit turns from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the harvest season for the fruit (the freshness of the olive oil is very important).
The nutritional components of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in a variety of monounsaturated fatty acids, such as oleic acid and linoleic acid, as well as vitamins A, B, D, E, K and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most suitable oil for human nutrition among the oils discovered to date.
The Democratic National Convention ended, and Biden said that the flame of freedom would never go out
The online "Summit for Democracy" (Summit for Democracy) hosted by U.S. President Biden and attended by government leaders from 110 countries around the world, as well as leaders of civil society and the private sector, ended on Friday (Dec. 10).
In his closing remarks, Mr. Biden said that the flame of freedom burns in the hearts of every person in the world, and no authoritarian regime can extinguish it.
He also said that he planned to hold the second Global "Democracy Summit" in 2021.
Taiwan's representative to the UK and Hong Kong pro-democracy activist Joshua Wong also spoke at the summit on the second day.
Biden said, "We know the work in front of us is daunting.
But we know that we can meet challenges because I have said before that democracy is everywhere.
The totalitarian regime can never extinguish the tiny flame of freedom, which burns in the hearts of people all over the world and in every corner of the world. ”
Biden also said that defending democracy requires the effort of the whole society.
He said: "As leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, to strengthen the guardrails of democracy, to push for reform, to make the system more transparent, to resist authoritarianism, and to pursue power before the public interest.
The second day of the “Democracy Summit” will focus on defending human rights, consolidating democracy and resisting authoritarianism, and fighting digital authoritarianism and affirming the value of democracy.
This day is International Human Rights Day.
The Secretary-General of the United Nations, António Guterres, also spoke at the opening of the day, saying that democracy is facing challenges around the world, especially the challenges brought by new digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reiterate our common values and positions, and to demonstrate our democratic resilience.
This requires deepening social dialogue, addressing inequality, fighting corruption, updating social contracts, investing in quality education, and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires a resolute condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all the tools provided by the technological revolution. "
Hong Kong human rights activist Ruo Guancong delivered a speech through a pre-recorded video at the summit, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of Hong Kong and Uyghurs and Tibetans, etc. in China.
He said: "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but there is no mechanism to hold China accountable.
That's why political leaders and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all of our resources (resources) to ensure that the restoration of democracy is our top priority. ”
Lo Kuan-chung also called on the free world to unite to counter the threat of the CCP.
He said: "Some of you may be scared of angering Xi Jinping, some of you may not want to lose the Chinese market, and some of you may not realise (the CCP) is threatening our democratic values.
And that is why we failed.
That's why we have to change. "
Taiwan's Ministry of the Interior Vice-Minister Tang Feng attended a roundtable discussion on "Fighting Digital Totalitarianism and Defending Democracy Values" and released a video statement, emphasizing that Taiwan is on the front line of fighting against authoritarianism and totalitarianism.
He also shared his experience in combating the novel coronavirus through information transparency and building mutual trust.
He said: "In the era of democracy in Taiwan, we have always stood at the forefront of the global fight against authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the pandemic, authoritarian governments around the world have rationalized the infringement of human rights in the name of public health and collective interests, and global democracy has shown signs of regression.
However, in Taiwan, we do not need to close the city to control the epidemic, and we do not need to take down the fake information. ”
At the same time as the second day of the "Democracy Summit", the U.S. Treasury Department announced the imposition of legal sanctions on 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea and other countries for serious violations of human rights. At the same time, the U.S. Treasury also imposed investment restrictions on a Chinese company that had allegedly used surveillance technology to help violate human rights.
I've already taken pictures and uploaded them to you.
I know.
But the restaurant doesn't know why it keeps delaying the delivery time.
Originally, it was #NUMBER#.
So I didn't call.
Not eaten
I will definitely complain
Why didn't you tell me earlier?
By the time you get there
I didn't get a call
Please notify him to be sent back to our company
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes.
One meal waited for an hour and a half.
#PRS_ORG# did not reach
I want to cancel the order
Why not cancel it?
Hello, the chicken in the restaurant is alive.
I wanted to try tennis, but I was afraid I wouldn't be able to keep up, so I wanted to try a place that was similar in price.
In fact, the price is often directly proportional to the friendliness, and if you can't tell the difference, then the expensive normal situation will be more friendly than the cheap one, which is actually industrial garbage.
They are very weak, and the ball hits the bat and vibrates very much, and the hard ball cannot hold up. It is very difficult for the experts to control.
The logic and subtext of their existence is that - tennis is so hard, you don't know how to play, and you don't want to spend a lot of money, so I'll make a cheap one for you, and you'll play twice, and you won't play again.
When you can really tell the difference, that means you've improved, and then I'll come back here and buy the expensive things, and I'll make two times the money.
It is suggested that you buy a second-hand one that is a little better for the same price, choose Prince or Dunlop, these two brands are not well-known, so it is not easy to sell, so it is better to buy a new one for 500 or 600, and the second-hand one for 200 is not bad, and you can enjoy the experience of having a thousand-dollar ball.
It is very friendly to beginners, but once you pass the beginner stage, it is useless, but most people, especially girls, cannot pass the beginner stage.
The order has been delayed several times in the delivery time.
Can you follow up on this?
Postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I already have credit?
Do I need to place another order? I wonder if I didn't pay attention to that one.
Hello, you've ordered food from this restaurant, but it was missing a lot of things and the chicken was raw
#PRS_ORG# I have no reason or purpose to take it, please cancel
I only ordered delivery, and there was no self-collection option at all
In the next three years, Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural elementary school music teachers-Xinhua News
The Xinhua News Agency Nanchang, Jiangxi (reporter Chen Yushan) reporter recently learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Education Department that since 2016, Jiangxi Province has planned to train qualified music, art and physical education teachers for each primary school in rural areas of the province in three years, totaling 10,000.
It is understood that the training object is the rural primary school teachers in Jiangxi Province who are 45 years old or younger and have the basic knowledge of music, art and physical education, and can teach other disciplines of music, art and physical education.
Through training, they have mastered the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the subject of vocal beauty, updated their teaching ideas and concepts, mastered modern teaching methods, improved their teaching ability, activity design ability, campus cultural ability and self-development ability, and built a team of vocal beauty teachers with one major and multiple specialties, alleviating the shortage of vocal beauty teachers in rural areas.
In order to ensure the quality and effectiveness of the training, Jiangxi has planned to set up music, art and sports training for 100 primary schools (cities, counties) in the province, with 300 trainees in total, to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration and leadership ability, teaching and research activity design and organization ability, training ability and network training workshop construction ability, and play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting another 20 minutes has already been 1 hour #NUMBER# minutes.
I don't want to eat food that was made one hour ago
I found the buyer of the previous error order
But my wheel pie was missing
The editor brings you the best face cream.
How good is face wash cream?
1. Korean Skincare and Makeup Set, Moisturizing and Whitening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and Brightening, Brightening and
Recommended reason: It has the effect of tightening the skin, repairing the peptide, shaping the firm skin, eliminating the sagging of the skin, improving the crow's feet and fine lines around the eyes, and the moisturizing effect is very excellent. It can quickly penetrate the skin.
The shelf life (year) is 5, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, the efficacy of whitening, the content (mL/g) set, the product packaging has a gift box, suitable for mixed skin, the efficacy of freckles, the efficacy of moisturizing, the efficacy of moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the efficacy of tightening, the product packaging has a seal, the product is produced in Jiangsu Suzhou, and is not a special purpose cosmetic, the efficacy is other, currently has more than 140,000+ people to evaluate, received 99% of the praise rate, praised its use is very good, the packaging is very good, high-end and atmospheric.
2. Korean skin care and makeup set hyaluronic acid and mild and clean water and moisturizing and moisturizing large water light moisturizing gift box six sets (facial cleanser, toner, milk, essence, cream)
Recommended reason: It has the effects of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and toning the skin, which can improve the problem of rough skin and large pores, and is suitable for mixed skin types. It is clean and not dry after washing.
The shelf life (year) is 5, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, suitable for mixed skin, moisturizing effect, suitable for skin age 25-34, net content (ml/g) 120ml + 120ml + 100ml + 6g * 3, moisturizing effect, product packaging has outer box, product packaging has seal, product origin is Jiangsu Suzhou, currently has 7700+ reviews, with 99% positive reviews, rating it refreshing and comfortable, moisturizing effect is good, high-end and atmospheric.
3. OsmoOSM Makeup Set, Nutritious Beauty Skin Crystal Colorless Moisturizing Moisturizing Cleansing Milk Skin Care Set for Women (Face Wash + Toner + Eye Cream + Emulsion + Face Cream)
Recommended reasons: Deeply clean the skin, help remove the dust and oil on the skin, and refine the pores, and can effectively nourish the skin and moisturize the skin. It can improve the skin's dark yellow and color spots, and can improve the skin's dark yellow and color spots. It can help improve the skin's self-care ability and help the skin recover its firmness.
The shelf life (year) is 4 years, and the product is produced in Zhejiang Huizhou. Is it a special purpose cosmetic? No, the efficacy is to relieve and calm, the efficacy is to whiten, the content (mL/g) is a set, the efficacy is to moisturize, suitable for any skin type, the efficacy is to moisturize, the product packaging has an outer box, the efficacy is to refine pores, the efficacy is to deep clean, and currently has more than 220,000+ people who have evaluated it, with a 98% approval rate, and it is highly praised for its comfort and high quality.
4, Hanhoo Red Garnet Fresh Nourishing and Harvesting Six-Piece Set (Skincare, Makeup, and Hair Care Products Set, Moisturizing and Moisturizing, Students, Girls, Face Wash, Soothing Water, Milk Cream, Eye Cream, Gift Box)
Recommended reasons: deep cleaning pores, softening aging keratin, pulling and tightening skin, lightening facial fine lines, soft and plump facial skin, moisturizing at the same time can improve skin quality, prevent the occurrence of fine wrinkles, suitable for any skin type, non-greasy and non-comedogenic.
Hello, how long will it take to deliver the food that I have ordered
They have already finished their work.
Your rider is #PHONENUMBER#, name is #NAME#
Please give me a reasonable explanation
Yes, but your rider is a problem, and it's a hassle to deal with
If you can, check if she is still on the road. If you can, send her to where she is.
OK, if not, then return the money for the meal
In fact, there are many things to consider when dressing petite girls.
The skirt should not be too short or too long, and the length should be about knee-length, just enough to cover the thighs.
If the skirt is too short, the fat on the thighs will be exposed.
The longer you are, the shorter and fatter you will look.
If you wear a suit in three pieces, it will make you look taller, with different colors for the jacket, trousers and long stockings, which will create a sense of elongation.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the must-haves of plus-size girls (the author has a deep understanding of this), and dark colors are also a good way to cover your body fat, and the noble and elegant black short skirt is the first choice of plus-size girls.
Wearing dark colors, especially black, will make you look slimmer.
If your legs are fat, don't wear pants or shoes that draw attention.
The more popular it is, the better. The colors should not be too bright.
To prevent people from feeling fat when they pay attention to your legs and feet.
For the slightly chubby girl, it is very important to learn how to dress and match.
Don't wear tight-fitting short skirts, and don't wear tops that are too short or too tight, as it will make you feel uncomfortable. If your legs are thick, you should wear black long stockings or grid stockings (the kind with small grids), and choose a soft printed bell skirt to cover up the shortcomings of the fat girl.
Of course, girls who are slightly chubby should also pay attention when they wear short skirts.
Fat girls should choose shirts with the same color as the short skirt, so that the fat body will have an increase in height effect.
Short skirts with high heels can make your legs look longer, which is the most in-style combination in summer!
If you are a plus-size person with thin legs, we recommend that you choose a gorgeous dress.
It can not only cover the big belly, but also show your advantages.
The A-line short skirt is very slim, and it is more suitable for fat girls. Choose a tight-fitting shirt to create a sense of slimness.
A simple white T-shirt matched with a short skirt is also a good choice for fat men.
Petite girls can also pull off the look.
As long as you can master the rules of dressing and matching, the little fat girls will also be the focus of the crowd.
After changing the way of dressing and matching, it is also necessary to exercise more in life, and strive to get rid of the label of micro-fat women as early as possible 😄
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards, jointly organized by FoodBev Media and Brau Beviale International Beer, Wine and Beverage Industry Exhibition in Nuremberg, Germany.
279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories competed.
The finalists were announced on October 15, and the final winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that LP28 No Sugar Milk by Mengqi Forest won the Best Milk Drink Award, and the marketing campaign "GOGO Wuhan" by Elian Mush won the Best Marketing Activity Award, and the packaging of Pepsi Cola and People's Daily New Media won the Best Packaging Design/Label Award.
Laura Nettle, senior marketing manager at FoodBev Media, said: "We are delighted to be celebrating the 18th anniversary of the World Beverage Innovation Awards with Brau Beviale.
From new flavors, new concepts and new functions to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we have seen the trends in the beverage industry as the industry continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here is the full list of finalists in each category.
Ardagh Group's technology can turn 100 percent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The water in the box is packaged in a bag, and the packaging box is 100% recyclable, reducing the packaging by 66% and reducing carbon emissions by 97%.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper, and does not use harmful glues or tape.
Ardagh Group's technology can re-melt 100 percent of recycled glass to make new bottles.
The final winners will be announced on the FoodBev Media YouTube channel on November 11 (British Summer Time), and FBIF will continue to report for you, please look forward to it!
Why so long
He was starving to death.
From 7:30 a.m. to now
Don't answer if you don't want to
I can go out and buy food to eat, I don't need to stay here #PRS_ORG #
Xinhua News Agency + Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League ignites the enthusiasm for the Winter Olympics - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, Beijing DreamING player Pang Yaotian (China) scored a goal in the match.
Today, the 2021-2022 season of the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete at various ice rinks in Beijing.
This year's league is divided into regular season and post-season, and the age groups of participating athletes are U6 to U18. The teams are divided into competitive and selection groups, and nearly 3,600 players from 256 teams in the city will participate.
The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club has developed for more than ten years, and has become a platform for young ice hockey players to hone their skills and make friends, and also a source of excellent players for the Beijing Youth Team and the youth team.
The league has played a positive role in the promotion of the ice hockey competition for Beijing's youth, and has fanned the enthusiasm for ice hockey in the Winter Olympics, and laid a foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing during the period after the Winter Olympics.
The girl was a target for arrows: "It's just a flesh wound" - Xinhua News Agency
A girl stood in front of a large wooden plank in the Wulin Square in Hangzhou, and the words "human target, ten yuan per arrow" were written on the plank.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a "girl from Hangzhou" donating for her sister went viral on social media.
The photo shows a girl standing in front of a wooden plank that is slightly higher than a person, with the words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" written on it, indicating that passers-by can use a bow and arrow to shoot at the human target after paying the fee.
The incident has sparked a lot of discussion on social media.
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Sub-Bureau of the Public Security Bureau of Hangzhou City confirmed to the reporter of Xin Jing News that the police confirmed that the girl made such a radical move because of her sister's donation, but this kind of behavior is not worthy of emulation, and the girl left the local police station yesterday after being admonished.
Girl street "arrow target" fundraising defendant admonished
In the picture circulated on the Internet, a girl with long hair stood in front of a large wooden board, and the words "human flesh target, ten yuan per shot" were written on the wooden board with black ink. There was her bank account and WeChat and Alipay account written on another wooden board in front of her.
The picture sparked controversy after it was posted online.
Some netizens think that this is a "seeking attention" behavior, and there are many netizens who sympathize with this.
"We arrived at the square at around 10 a.m. on the 23rd and found that the crowd had already gathered. "
When local media interviewed the police officers at the scene of the incident, they said that there were two female vendors at the scene, both of whom were around 20 years old and dressed in a youthful and beautiful manner.
One of the girls, who was playing the "human target" game, was crying and asking passers-by to play the game with her. The other girl was standing by and shouting, saying that her friend's sister had leukemia and needed surgery urgently. Please help.
"We have contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was fundraising for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Sub-Bureau of the Public Security Bureau of Hangzhou City told the reporter of Xinjing Daily that the girl's name was Ji Jia Li and she was collecting donations for her sister, Ji Jia Yan.
But since the treatment still costs more than 300,000 yuan, he has no idea how to raise the money, so he did this.
He said that during the whole process, two girls acted as targets, one was responsible for shooting, but did not participate in it, and no one shot arrows during the whole process. Only some people watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
Police later determined that the bow and arrow used in the crime did not fall under the purview of the regulation.
The official said, "We do not encourage this kind of fundraising."
After being warned by the police station, she left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good, light and thinness: convenient, appearance material: satisfactory, and the price is very good.
The new machine is very good.
The performance is stable, and there is no problem with the four outlets for heat dissipation, and it is worth recommending.
This is a very good game, the workmanship and materials are very good, and the brand is trustworthy!
The price of the Lenovo Dark Knight Knight Dragon is not too expensive.
I think the shadow knight dragon is a good game, the game effect: the game effect is smooth, you can play most of the games, my chicken all high ** frame rate is very stable, lol is also not in words, CSgo is also easy to handle, most of the three a games can be played
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation effect is good, and the fan is very powerful. It is quiet when working, and the gaming effect is also good.
Visuals: The visuals are pretty cool, and the screen resolution is 1080p. Gameplay: The gameplay is smooth, and 1080p is enough for playing games.
Buying a notebook feels good, mainly for design purposes. The price-performance ratio is very high, and it is lighter than expected and looks better than expected. The red on the butt is a very good-looking wine color, not tacky, and it is much better than expected. It is worth buying, and girls are also suitable.
Two years ago, I started to contact the Dark Knight of Hongqi, and it took two years to use it. The price-performance ratio is very high, and the quality is very good!
My friends have also recommended them to buy this product!
We have already purchased the three machines in this series!
The appearance is beautiful and the configuration is also good
He bought the tickets for his nephew in anticipation of the 418 bank event, but he needed them urgently, so he bought them in advance, so he missed the big event of the 418 bank.
However, the price is quite high, and the logistics is also quite fast. I will come back to review it after a period of time.
A brand new, high-end gaming laptop with a great design and already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019
The effect: bought the child to do 3D rendering, the software has been installed, the child said that it can be used normally, and the performance of this computer can do 3D design work.
He said it was a good gift for his son.
The computer is good, especially the customer service attitude is very good, if you don't understand, just ask, recommend to buy
It's also good, the graphics of the game are really good
What was the most popular thing in 2021?
It is undoubtedly the Tokyo Olympics.
Do you think only Olympians can win awards?
There was a recent article called "Watch out! Project managers can beat the gold medal in Olympic projects" that was very popular. The article mentioned that project managers can beat the gold medal in many projects, and there is no one who can compete with them: moving bricks, going on business trips, and staying up late are the daily routines of project managers. Firefighting, taking the blame, and apologizing are not in their vocabulary.
The article seems to be a joke, but it also reflects the daily bitterness of project managers. Behind it is the unwillingness to do the current project management work.
And the people engaged in project management are gradually choosing to get out of the predicament of work through some actions.
As the number of PMP (international certification for project management professionals) applicants has been increasing year by year, more and more project managers have improved their project management skills through learning.
According to the China Project Management Development Report (1999-2019), as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® applicants in China was nearly 600,000, and the number of PMP® certified was about 420,000, and the number of valid certificates was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the total number of PMP® certificates in the world.
Over the past 10 years, the number of PMP holders has been increasing year by year, which indicates that more and more project managers have realized that it is no longer acceptable to rely on the "old experience" to do things. We know that the ever-changing work environment requires us to learn and explore the road ahead by standing on the shoulders of giants.
However, can PMP certification guarantee the smooth running of project management work?
Many project management beginners expressed that by learning related courses such as PMP/IPMP, they can systematically master the knowledge points of the ten fields and five processes of project management, but when they actually do project management work, they are still in the fog.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: lack of project management knowledge, relying on personal experience, lack of project management theory, not knowing how to practice; lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to land in work, project estimation is not accurate, sensitivity of control is low, and the project drags on and on; unclear division of labor among members, the “old oil man” in the team does not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental assistance communication is not smooth, and the project is difficult to progress ……
Therefore, by focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises to cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key talents, and has won the honorary titles of “China Enterprise R&D Talent Training Demonstration Base” and so on.
The online course "Project Manager Training Camp" is a type of online fragmented learning, which combines the practical cases, tools and methods of many R&D enterprises, and helps you master the essential knowledge and standard actions of project managers, so that you can go up the ladder of your own project management.
This is also an opportunity to reduce costs and investment, and promote the development of project managers, and bring high-efficiency operation results to the enterprise.
The course is not only taught by the Central China Star Experts Team (the original Huawei R&D Management Team), but also combines the international advanced project management theories and the real business scenarios of many well-known enterprises, and provides in-depth and comprehensive professional explanations.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, rich templates and forms, and help students convert their learning into specific work after class.
One dumpling order?
Why have six fingers?
Before the Double 12, Jingxin advocates rational consumption - Economic Observer - Professional Financial News Website
This year, the transaction amount of network payment business in China reached 1.77 trillion yuan during the “Double 11” carnival, which is a new high compared with last year.
The variety of lucky red envelopes, which are filled with money, once again made consumers exclaim that they have benefited from it. On the one hand, it made people feel that the national consumption power is becoming stronger and stronger. On the other hand, it is necessary to calm down and think about the impact of consumerism on society and the mainstream consumer group in contemporary society.
Before the arrival of “Double Twelve”, Jingxin Consumer Financial Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jingxin”) issued a rational consumption advocacy, reminding all users, especially young people, to establish good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and reject blind consumption and excessive consumption.
According to the results of the Consumer Financial Literacy Survey and Analysis Report published by the People's Bank of China this year, the national consumer financial literacy index is 66.81, which is 2.04 higher than that of 2019.
In general, the performance of Chinese residents in financial consumption is better, but there is a large difference in financial behavior and skills, and further improvement is needed in the level of basic financial knowledge.
The financial literacy of the elderly and the young is relatively low, and “one old and one young” will still be the focus of financial education. The report released by Nielsen shows that the young generation has huge consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way to upgrade consumption. 86.6% of young people use credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although the young generation as a whole shows a trend of rational consumption, it is far from the label of “over-consumption” by the outside world. However, some young people do have excessive consumption and follow-the-herd behavior, which has led to a large amount of financial pressure and debt risk, and even caused social problems to gradually increase. Financial enterprises should actively assume social responsibilities and carry out positive guidance.
As a licensed consumer financial institution, ZTE has always been committed to providing high-quality and considerate services to help people build their own happy life, advocating that consumers establish good and correct consumption concepts, and actively respond to regulatory calls to improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young people.
In the past few years, ZTE has carried out all-round and diversified financial knowledge popularization activities for young people including college students through various forms such as cooperation with domestic top-tier universities to launch innovation practice competitions, so as to reasonably guide the consumption demand of young people and help them build a rational consumption concept, rationally plan their consumption demand, and thus help them accumulate wealth in their lives.
As the 12th Double 12 Festival approaches, Jingxin reminds all consumer friends to establish reasonable consumption consciousness and correct money views, resist blind consumption and overconsumption, avoid the trap of consumer credit, and avoid affecting personal credit and economic life in the future.
When you are consuming, you must plan in advance and pay on time according to your ability.
If it is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the individual credit report, which may have a negative impact on the purchase of a car and the purchase of a house in the future.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, you should also choose legitimate institutions and channels, and pay attention to check whether the relevant institutions have the qualification to operate.
In the future, ZTE will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously update and iterate its financial products to provide consumers with more personalized and diversified services to help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing.
I won't go
I'm on a delivery.
This one hour has gone by without anyone contacting me, which is basically online fraud.
You think I'm calling for the first time to order take-out?
After the survey, you are saying the same thing! I checked the address several times before I placed the order
Okay, thank you! How many days?
Vietnam News - Gulf Cooperation Council responds to common challenges
The stops include Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
It is worth noting that this is the first visit to Qatar by the Crown Prince since the Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a blockade on Qatar in the middle of 2017, which led to the Gulf diplomatic crisis.
In this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a comprehensive embargo, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close relations with Iran.
The diplomatic tension has seriously affected the internal unity of the Hague Conference, and has had a negative impact on the economy of the region.
Four Arab nations have blocked a land, sea and air route to Qatar.
The crisis was only resolved at the January 2021 summit of the Bay of Bengal Initiative for Multi-Sectoral Technical and Economic Cooperation (BIMSTEC), when member states signed an agreement mediated by the United States and Kuwait to move towards "unity and stability".
Saudi Arabia reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are working to restore relations with Qatar by first reaching out to the new ambassadors appointed by the two countries in Qatar.
The Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) has resolved its differences to restore relations with Qatar in order to address common challenges.
During the visit of the Saudi Crown Prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land route between the two Gulf neighbors.
The 725-kilometer channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for travel and integration of supply chains for citizens of the two countries.
The Saudi Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $50 billion in Oman, and 13 cooperation memorandums worth $30 billion have been signed between the two countries.
Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman is on a visit to Gulf states at a time when Iran is negotiating with the world's major powers over a nuclear agreement known as the Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action (JCPOA) - - a deal that Gulf Arab states have condemned for failing to address their concerns over Iran's missile program.
Each Gulf state has long viewed Iran as a long-term "competitor" and viewed Iran's nuclear program as a "threat" to regional security.
Each Gulf state believes that not resolving the Iranian missile issue and not taking action to curb Iran's activities in the region is flawed.
Against the backdrop of failed negotiations between Saudi Arabia and Iran on the Iranian nuclear issue, Saudi Arabia and Iran have held direct talks.
Its goal is to curb the escalation of tensions in the region.
This is one of the factors that have slowed the growth of the countries' economies in the Gulf Cooperation Council.
The upcoming ASEAN Summit will be the first summit of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN) since the dispute between some of its members and Qatar ended.
This is an opportunity to re-evaluate the contribution of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) to promoting the unification of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) and to propose measures to fully cooperate with its member states to address common challenges and contribute to the stability and development of Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered until 9:30 p.m., and you need to return the deposit and cancel the order.
Okay
It is said to be the loudest exhaust sound in the New District!
This car that our team brought for everyone is a dream come true for many men!
It is the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the Aventador LP700-4!
The price is nearly two million, and the annual road tax is more than ten thousand, and the four-wheel drive, why is it called LP700?
Because it has 700 horsepower, can you imagine how fast it can go?
That's it, I don't know, the data says that it only takes 2.9 seconds to accelerate from 0 to 100 km/h, which is roughly equivalent to myvi reaching 30 km/h when it reaches 100 km/h.
The low-slung body, the arrogant scissor doors, the huge air intakes all over the body, and the endless 6.5 V12 engine under the glass, perfectly interpret the style of Lamborghini.
For the description of the car, you don't need to say too much, just Google it yourself. We have collected some explanations that Google may not give.
It's too much to see, where everyone is looking, and it's not comfortable (in a good way).
1km oil change costs RM1 (owner doesn't care)
Practice getting in and out of the car, otherwise it will be a bit awkward (because you can't get out of the car and get stuck halfway)
The engine is too loud, and after getting out of the car, my ears will suddenly be deaf. (But it's very cool.)
The car is too big to park in a normal parking space, and it is very afraid of being knocked by the door when the neighbor's car is opened!
A little lonely because there was no one on the road (I was talking to the driver, nothing to do with the car).
Please don't misunderstand, this supercar is not for sale, sorry!
If you want to take a video of your car, welcome to contact us!
More car news you didn't know about is at The Car Guide / People's Guide to Cars
A million-dollar car crash!
Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are both known by car enthusiasts, and Chiron is one of the most expensive supercars in the world, while the price of Porsche 911 is also in the million-level!
Before that, the foreign car had killed a million 911 and a million supercars Chiron in just a few minutes!
The results are a good thing!
Let the spirit of the university and the spirit of the times resonate with each other - Xinhua News Agency
The spirit of a university is the series of educational concepts and values that have been accumulated over a long period of time in the development of a university, which is the soul of the university.
From ancient times to the present, the spirit of the university is of great importance to the development of politics, economy, culture, science and technology, and society, and even the progress of a nation.
From the birth of the first modern university, the mission of the university is different from that of other social organizations. For Chinese universities, its spirit is deeply influenced by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocates the value concept of “righteousness for the world and harmony for the world” and the patriotic responsibility of “strengthening the country and advancing the country”.
Currently, the trend of higher education informationization and internationalization is becoming more and more obvious, and the global education competition, technology competition and talent competition are constantly intensifying. Higher education is an important “supply side” and faces unprecedented opportunities and challenges in structural reform.
In addition, the proposal of “the overall plan for promoting the construction of world-class universities and world-class disciplines” has not only shown the confidence and determination of China to move from a large country in higher education to a strong country in higher education, but also put forward higher requirements for the development of universities.
How to make rapid progress in the world rankings in a relatively short period of time, and accelerate the construction of a number of world-class universities and a number of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap, so as to achieve “surpassing the bends ” ?
In addition to the confidence in the target, the confidence in the path, and the confidence in the ability, colleges and universities should fully play the three advantages: First, the advantage of latecomers, through the continuous introduction of overseas outstanding academic talents, learning and borrowing from the advanced experience of first-class universities in the world, to achieve a significant improvement in academic level and school quality; Second, the cultural advantage, inheriting the wisdom of the Chinese civilization that has been accumulated for thousands of years, and promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, so as to consolidate the power, shape the brand, and improve the image; Third, the institutional advantage, taking advantage of the superior system of the socialist state, strengthening the target drive, gathering consensus and working together to optimize the resource allocation, so as to provide a sustainable and solid guarantee for the school to accelerate catching up with the advanced level of the world.
In particular, it is necessary to realize that it is impossible to build a world-class university with a thousand campuses. At the same time, each school must highlight its own advantages and characteristics.
The features of education should both have the common Chinese characteristics and reflect the unique target positioning, educational tradition and resource endowment of each school.
As for Zhejiang University, we focus on three aspects in our education: one is to highlight the characteristics of cultivating innovative and entrepreneurial talents, build an integrated education environment of school-enterprise integration, and form a whole chain of entrepreneurship education ecology; the second is to highlight the characteristics of cross-disciplinary aggregation, promote the optimization and adjustment of the academic system, and create an institutional environment for cross-disciplinary research and development; the third is to highlight the characteristics of the education system and social services, carry out in-depth international exchanges and cooperation, and accelerate the formation of a cross-university research and service cooperation system.
In this process, it is particularly important to always adhere to the spirit of the university, so that the spirit of the university can resonate with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the school motto of “seeking truth from facts” and the common values of “hard work, education, discernment, and practicality” as well as “embracing the rivers and lakes of the world, opening up the true spirit of the world, opening up the world for the people, and building my country and my country” constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to continue to adhere to the right direction of education, to accumulate cultural height, to consolidate spiritual strength, and to be rich in connotation and far-reaching significance.
Among them, “Haina River River” emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, which embodies the spirit of “using the talents of the world for my own use”, and is manifested in the pursuit of high-quality ideas of quality education and training of world-class schools. “Qi Zhen Houde” emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth from facts, which means that the university should not only pursue the truth, but also be willing to accept the training of virtue and personality. “Kai Wu Pingmin” reflects the spirit of reform and innovation, which includes the spirit of seeking new knowledge, innovation in research, and reform and development. “Shui Wo Bangguo” emphasizes the spirit of patriotism, which means that the university should always be with the destiny of the nation.
This series of spiritual concepts and value pursuits is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120-year history.
"The wise hear the silence, and the wise see the unseen."
Chinese universities should further stand on the global stage of socialist cause of China, deeply grasp the era and historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of a world-class university.
At the same time, upholding humanistic care and independent freedom, let the spirit of the university and the spirit of the times, the spirit of the nation, and the common ideal of mankind are mutually stimulated, so as to provide inexhaustible motivation for the realization of national strength and national rejuvenation, and the realization of the common ideal of mankind.
I ordered a set meal, and two items were sent wrong
Order
Wanted to pay for the service
How can I pay now?
Iran President: If sanctions are lifted, talks on nuclear deal are likely to reach agreement - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, December 11 (Reporter Gao Wencheng Wang Shoubao) Iran's President Raisi said on December 11 in Tehran that if the United States lifts its sanctions on Iran, the negotiations on the comprehensive agreement on the Iranian nuclear issue can reach a "good agreement."
According to the website of Iranian President Hassan Rouhani, on the day, during the meeting with the Iranian ambassador to the neighboring countries, Rouhani said that Iran has proved its sincerity in negotiations by submitting proposals to other relevant parties.
If the United States is determined, "the road to reaching an agreement will be open."
The parties involved in the Iran nuclear agreement began to hold talks in Vienna, Austria, in April this year to discuss the issue of restoring compliance with the agreement.
The new round of talks began on November 29 in Vienna, and was temporarily suspended on December 3, and continued on December 9.
I haven't received the delivery yet.
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Dalian Science and Technology Forum - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2021, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Science Forum in the Greater Bay Area on December 11.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is undergoing a historic change unseen in a century, and global science and technology innovation has entered a period of intense activity, and the new round of science and technology revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Greater Bay Area of Guangdong, Hong Kong and Macao should focus on the strategic positioning of building an international science and technology innovation center, and strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland, and promote the development of new industries.
China is willing to work with scientists and international science and technology organizations around the world to strengthen international science and technology exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote the solution of common scientific and technological problems, deepen scientific and technological cooperation on major scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of world science.
The 2021 Science Forum in the Greater Bay Area opened in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the day, with the theme of “Exploring the Future and Sharing Science”. It was co-sponsored by the Guangdong Provincial People’s Government.
Yes, the order is in the acceptance stage.
But the restaurant said that since the rider did not deliver the meat and bones, the restaurant had to cut the meat and discard the bones.
Do you understand my problem?
It is not a delay order
Or you can call me directly
Are you following?
The maximum duration of leave for college students in Guangxi is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Agency
According to a special phone call from Xinhua News Agency (reporter Zhang Ying) on May 19, all universities in Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region will implement a flexible credit system in the future, which will relax the upper limit of the number of holidays for college students, and extend the period of time during which college students can study and start their own businesses by up to 2 to 5 years on the basis of the original credit system. The period of time during which students can study and start their own businesses can be regarded as a period of practice education.
In order to promote the improvement of entrepreneurial innovation ability of college students, Guangxi education, employment and social security departments have jointly built an entrepreneurial platform, built more college students’ off-campus practice teaching bases, university science and technology parks, university entrepreneurship parks and incubation bases, and provided external guarantees for college students’ entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the innovation and entrepreneurship practice area of each college and university should reach more than 3000 square meters for undergraduate schools, and more than 2000 square meters for vocational schools.
The government encourages universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and supports students who perform well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice to transfer to other majors.
Every two years, teachers of higher education institutions must spend at least two months to work in industry enterprises to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The education department of the autonomous region requires that all universities in Guangxi implement the innovation and entrepreneurship training plan for college students in depth, and strive to make every college student participate in an innovation and entrepreneurship training plan during their study period.
Colleges should actively organize students to participate in various levels of innovation and entrepreneurship competitions, and provide financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: Oxford University awards honorary doctorates to seven distinguished individuals
The University of Macau held the 2021 Honorary Degree and Higher Degree Conferment Ceremony on November 11, 2021, and awarded the Honorary Doctorate of the University of Macau to Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixin, Nakamura Shuuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiaoling, Zhu Liliang and Jiang Chaohui for their outstanding achievements and major contributions to the development of society and education.
At the conferment ceremony, the Chief Executive and Chairman of the Council of the University of Macau, Mr. Ou Yang Yu, and the Secretary for Social Affairs and Culture, Mr. Lo Kin-chung, accompanied by the President of the University of Macau, Mr. Song Yong-hua, awarded the Honorary Doctorate Degree to the Chairman of the Council of the University of Macau, Mr. Lin Kincheng and the President of the University of Macau, Mr. Song Yong-hua.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of education, Professor Chen Kaixian was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of natural science, Professor Nakamura Shuji was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of natural science, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of natural science, Professor Li Xiaoliang was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of business administration, Professor Zhu Lili was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of natural science, and Ms. Jiang Chaohui was awarded the honorary doctoral degree of natural science.
In his speech, Ouyang Yu expressed his warm congratulations and high respect to the seven outstanding scholars who were awarded the honorary doctorates. They have made outstanding achievements in different fields and made great contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world. At the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed his sincere blessings to the graduates and parents. He also expressed his sincere respect to the university's dedicated and excellent teachers.
Professor Sun Yifang, a professor of the Australian National University, read Liu Zunyi’s eulogy when he was awarded the honorary degree, and said that Professor Liu Zunyi was a renowned economist in the world and was known for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational philosophy.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth and East Asia economic field, he is also a visionary education leader.
In short, he has made great achievements in many fields.
Sun Yifang read a eulogy for Professor Nakamura Shuuji, saying that Professor Nakamura Shuuji was the pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for his invention of blue light-emitting diodes (LEDs).
Professor Nakamura's invention not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also promoted the widespread application of white light-emitting diodes in daily life and industrial production, and made a great contribution to the welfare of mankind.
Sun Yifeng read Li Lanjuan’s eulogy when she was reading Li Lanjuan’s eulogy, and said that Li Lanjuan, as a pioneer in the Chinese artificial liver industry, created a unique and effective Li artificial liver system, which achieved great breakthroughs in the treatment of severe hepatitis and liver failure, and significantly reduced the mortality rate of liver failure.
In this battle against the novel coronavirus, she and her team proposed the "four-pronged and two-balanced" plan and brought in three technologies of artificial liver, microbiome and stem cells, which significantly improved the survival rate of severe cases.
Sun Yifang read Li Xiaoliang’s eulogy, saying that Professor Li Xiaoliang laid a solid foundation for innovative research on operations management and shaped the thinking of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model of the world.
Li Xiaoliang is well known for popularizing the concept of the long tail effect in operations management and exploring measures to deal with this phenomenon.
Now, in the face of the pandemic and the tense economic situation, the long-term effect of the long-arm effect is more and more prominent, and the supply chain is severely disrupted.
Li Xialing's far-sighted research, such as the delivery of coal in the snow, helps the industry to cope with difficulties and brings huge social value.
Sun Yifang read a eulogy for Zhu Lili, saying that in her scientific research work, she discovered a breakthrough and innovative staining technology to prepare samples, and gained a high reputation in the domestic and international scientific circles.
She has been awarded many important titles, such as the International Academy of Sciences, and has won the deserved position in the world's technology holy land with her brilliant achievements.
Professor Chen Xinxuan, Dean of the Chinese Medicine Research Institute of the University of Otago, read out Professor Chen Kaiwen's resignation letter, saying that Professor Chen Kaiwen has devoted more than 40 years to the research and development of drugs, and has made outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macao, the University of Macau and the National Key Laboratory.
His positive role in promoting the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission to contribute to the national pharmaceutical development strategy.
The president of the University of Technology of Australia, Mr. Xu Chengzhong, said that Ms. Jiang Chaohui has participated in the development of major inventions and patents, and has accumulated more than 15 inventions and patents related to storage virtualization, navigation, file system and power management, which are highly practical and widely used, and improve the convenience of human life.
As an inventor with great achievements, Madam Jiang often makes high-tech and theoretical knowledge easy to understand and popularize to the public.
Finally, Chen Kai, as the representative of the Honorary Doctorate, delivered a speech of thanks.
He was very happy to see that the pharmaceutical industry in Macau and the Greater Bay Area has established a good example: from the first national key laboratory for quality research of traditional Chinese medicine established in Macau to the vigorous development of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, Macau has made a great contribution by integrating outstanding talents in the field of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the University of Melbourne has far-sighted vision, and not only provides students with a research ground for scientific research, but also sends out many people with a sense of responsibility to the society.
He was delighted to be able to work with the University of Melbourne and to congratulate them on their recent achievements.
Did he have the correct address?
I haven't seen it yet
That rider went to the wrong place, so I didn't get it.
But I #PRS_ORG# received
The app has not been able to contact the rider
My family thought there was none.
But it has been one hour already
When the NFT craze was in full swing, the encrypted community also brought forth a new concept.
In 2021, a blockchain game called "Axie Infinity" caused a huge impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who lost their jobs due to the epidemic began to earn stable income in this game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game based on blockchain technology, which combines various gameplay including NFT, and is currently the highest-traded NFT project with more than $3 billion in transaction volume.
According to TokenTerminal data, Axie Infinity's daily income exceeded 820 million US dollars, and it was approaching "League of Legends".
On August 6, Axie Infinity announced that its daily active users exceeded 100,000.
Axie Infinity's popularity will spread a new "palytoearn" model to more people, and players will no longer be a single role. In addition to having fun and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecosystem.
This sovereignty is not granted by the game developer, but by the blockchain technology.
The biggest lesson I learned from seeing news about a friend's stock was that enterprises should first choose industries with large growth potential, at least with a market size of more than 1000 billion; secondly, they should choose industries with good growth potential in the future, and consider industries with the best growth potential in the next 3-5 years; finally, they should choose industries with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and the flatness or ruggedness of the track refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Go for the gold!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize the adjustment of 2021 and adjust the 2022 tactical layout.
The strategy is to "do things right", that is, to do things correctly.
The strategy is to "do the right thing," which means doing the right thing.
The essence of strategy is to find direction, and the essence of tactics is to land, and there is space for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking) can think about whether to deepen the current field or expand the horizontal field (strategic thinking); how to improve the customer retention rate (tactical thinking) can think about how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); how to improve the participation rate of activities (tactical thinking) can think about how to set the correct activity KPI, achieve the correct activity target, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and accurately attracting new customers; how to improve DAU (tactical thinking) can think about whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
It has been in existence for 12 years, and Bitcoin celebrated several milestones in 2021.
On September 7, the small Central American country of El Salvador will make Bitcoin a legal tender, making it the first country or region to make Bitcoin a legal tender.
On October 12, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission approved ProShares to launch a bitcoin ETF for the first time in eight years, and listed it on the New York Stock Exchange. This marks the first regulated bitcoin futures ETF to enter the US capital market, and further expands the investment opportunities of the cryptocurrency market.
From the perspective of blockchain technology development, Bitcoin is not the main character.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin performed a soft fork upgrade called “Taproot”, which improved the anonymity of Bitcoin network transactions and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
There is no McChicken, no McChicken sauce
If that McChicken was eaten, it would be very difficult to eat
Is your $32 discount code enough to buy what?
Is it possible to cancel in less than 15 minutes?
I'm typing in the code, why did it become a confirmed order?
Okay
I didn't get the discount?
Hello
The food was not delivered
The rider has already been sent
I hope you will be punctual, not because I want your coupons!
Did you encounter any problems with the initial registration of the first-level price, and did you encounter any problems with the continuing education credits?
Late registrants must provide proof of continuing education within the past year, at least 30 hours, to re-register. Late registrants must provide proof of continuing education within the past four years, at least 30 hours, to re-register. Late registrants must provide proof of continuing education within the past four years, at least 120 hours, to re-register. Late registrants must provide proof of continuing education within the past four years, at least 30 hours, to re-register.
Construction cost engineers continue to raise the standard of continuing education.
The cost of continuing education for engineers who participate in the network is required to pay the learning fee at the time of registration, generally speaking, the standard is: the cost of compulsory courses of 30 hours is 300 yuan/person/year (including the unified teaching materials of continuing education);
The cost of the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan per person per year.
The cost of compulsory courses and elective courses for 30 hours is 600 yuan/person/year (including unified education materials).
(1) Participate in the continuing education of registered cost engineers organized by the network of registered cost engineers, and calculate the credit hours according to the time recorded in the online learning courseware;
(2) Participate in the concentrated face-to-face training and various types of training classes, seminars, etc. organized by the registration price engineer of the Central Price Commission or the provincial and municipal and department management institutions, and each half day can be recognized 4 learning hours;
(3) Continue to provide training courses for price engineers, cost engineers, and cost accountants of the China Price Association, provincial and departmental cost engineers, and cost accountants, which can be counted as 10 hours of training per half day.
(4) Participate in the research and study of provincial-level projects, the compilation of industry standards, and the writing of textbooks. Each item is designated 30 credits per year.
(6) Participate in the writing of teaching materials for the national professional qualification examination for cost engineers, the setting, marking and evaluation of the examination, and the recognition of 30 credit hours per year;
(7) Engineering cost-related professional papers and books published with personal signatures and open publication (based on the official publication number).
Publishing a book of 100,000 words is equivalent to 12 credit hours.
Publishing a paper in a national journal requires 8 hours for every thousand words, publishing a paper in a provincial journal requires 5 hours for every thousand words, and publishing a paper in a city journal requires 3 hours for every thousand words.
(9) Organizations that organize public training (excluding general management and skill training for enterprises) approved or authorized by the Joint Price Negotiation Committee, provincial and department management institutions, and provincial construction price associations can be open to the public, and can be recognized for 4 hours per day, and a maximum of 30 hours per year.
Cost Engineers Network continues education learning process
After the registration institution receives the fee, the student's identity is immediately opened, and the cost engineer can enter the network education classroom with the username and password.
Students learn through watching videos, asking and answering questions online, and participating in discussions.
If you forget your password, you will be unable to log in when you enter the username and password incorrectly when you log in, and you cannot log in when you are learning. Please contact the registered institution and the registered institution can help you change the password (but cannot change the username), and use the new password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Baidu Tieba client
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery person has not collected the goods.
Please notify the delivery person immediately, we are still waiting
The restaurant had the food ready for the rider in 30 minutes
The wedding photography base (in Hebei) has not yet opened a branch
The wedding dress fashion is avant-garde, and the makeup artist is the best in the world. The photography technology and angle are professional, and the photography effect is very good.
The seller is very reliable and the service is also very good.
The makeup was very exquisite, and the team service was also very good. This trip was very happy, and the professional team was very good. The seller's service attitude is very good, and he will introduce it to his friends. I am very satisfied.
Thank you to the photographer and makeup artist for giving me a unique wedding photo.
Thank you to all the staff who participated in the wedding photo shoot today, and we look forward to the release of the film.
Photographing a wedding is a physical exercise, especially for the photographer, who runs and jumps.
The makeup artist was very thoughtful and designed a makeup suitable for my face. The photographer was humorous and funny when taking pictures, which was worth praising.
Thanks to my photographer and makeup artist, I can still see how beautiful I can be in my old age.
The eyes of the goddess are beautiful, the figure is generous and well-proportioned, and one can see that she is a good wife and a good mother. In the future, she will work hard to take care of her family.
The groom has earned a lot of money, and he will be happy for the rest of his life, and he will be happy with the beautiful and beautiful.
The wedding photos are really good, just like what people say online, and we look very handsome and beautiful. We are very satisfied.
The seller's attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This trip was not only to appreciate the scenery, but also to take beautiful wedding photos, and also to meet the photographer as a friend.
The wedding photos are too good to be true, and the photographer and makeup artist are really super professional.
I am very grateful to my sister for her patience and kind guidance, and I like the photos she took very much.
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't recognize myself for a moment.
As long as the photographer is good, you can also have a wedding photo that is comparable to that of a celebrity.
The most important thing about taking wedding photos is that the photographer and makeup artist are both online. Fortunately, I met them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I realized that I was also a "fool."
Asian-American group sues 3 Ivy League schools for racial discrimination - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Washington, May 23 (Reporter Xu Jianmei) - 130 Asian-American groups submitted a complaint to the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice on May 23, accusing three Ivy League schools - - Yale University, Brown University and Dartmouth College - - of discriminating against Asian-American applicants during the admissions process.
The Asian Pacific American Education Association held a press conference in Washington, D.C. on that day to file a lawsuit.
The president of the group, Zhao Yuankong, said that over the past 10 years, the number of Asian applicants meeting U.S. college admission requirements has more than doubled, but the proportion of Asian students at the three U.S. universities has remained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these colleges discriminate against Asian applicants in the "holistic" admissions process by "long-term, systemic, and discriminatory practices."
Zhao Yuankang introduced that the research of Sanders et al. in 2014 showed that the Asian applicants had the lowest admission rate among the three universities relative to the number of applicants.
The US Department of Education's data also shows that Brown University and Dartmouth College have the lowest acceptance rates for Asian students among all Ivy League schools, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented de facto racial quotas for Asian applicants for over 20 years.
Zhao Yuankang told Xinhua News Agency reporters that they hoped that the U.S. Department of Education and the Department of Justice would conduct an investigation after filing a complaint, and take measures to prevent these universities from discriminating against Asians in enrollment.
They also hope that the schools that are being complained about will actively pay attention to this issue and change their recruitment policies towards Asians.
So far, the three schools have not responded to the complaint.
The Asian American Education Alliance was founded in 2015, and had previously complained about Harvard University's discriminatory admissions policies, but the US Department of Education refused to accept the complaint on the grounds of procedures.
In addition to the American Chinese group, there are also American Indian, Korean, Japanese, and Pakistani education groups that participated in the lawsuit.
You need cutlery
Just cancelled the order
Why is it still being executed?
Can you check if there are any cancellations?
But I placed the order at 5:09 am in the morning.
It's a call centre, they don't know what they're talking about
Can you contact them directly by phone?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned that a factory located in Jingtong Town, Yiwu, Zhejiang Province from a real estate agent. After several site visits, Mr. Lu decided to buy the factory.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu negotiated with the family of the owner of the factory house and transferred 200,000 yuan as a down payment by bank transfer on the same day.
Lin signed as the receiver on the "Purchase and Sale Agreement of Factory", which stated that if the buyer did not want to buy the factory, the deposit would be returned to the seller, and if the seller did not want to sell the factory, the deposit would be doubled and both parties agreed to sign a contract for the purchase and sale of the factory within one week.
However, after the two sides failed to reach an agreement on the main contract terms, such as the scope of the sale of the factory, the payment method and other major contract terms, the house sale contract was delayed.
After a few days, Mr. Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
After seeing the house for a long time, the deposit was paid, and the money for the house was ready. All that was left was to sign the contract, but the seller did not sell. This made Mr. Lu helpless and angry.
For this, Mr. Lu filed a lawsuit against Lin at the Yucheng City People's Court.
The court considered that the parties were unable to sign a formal contract and could not be solely blamed on the defendant, so the case should not apply the liquidated damages provision. The defendant is not required to bear the double return of the liquidated damages.
After the first trial, the plaintiff appealed.
Recently, the Second Circuit upheld the original judgment.
【Lawyers remind】 During the transaction process, it is necessary to pay attention to the necessary precautions.
When signing the contract, as the buyer, you should pay attention to the necessary caution, such as verifying the information of the property owner, whether the property is occupied, and the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to avoid disputes between the parties when performing the contract.
(Deutsche Welle Chinese) After the conclusion of the "Democratic Summit" on Friday, China's Foreign Ministry spokesperson on Saturday (December 11) stated that the United States held the "Summit of the Leaders of the People's Republic of China", which was "to draw a line of ideology, turn democracy into a tool and weapon, and use the name of democracy to carry out anti-democratic practices, incite division and confrontation, and divert domestic contradictions."
The Chinese government believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on people, promoted the "democratic reform", abused unilateral sanctions, instigated the "color revolution", and caused disastrous consequences.
"Democracy" has already become the "large-scale lethal weapon" of the United States interfering with other countries.
This summit is a fulfillment of Biden's campaign promise.
The two-day meeting will be held in video format, and leaders from 111 countries around the world have been invited, including leaders from Taiwan, but China and Russia have not been invited.
Before the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its own democratic problems, saying that the United States is not qualified to host such a summit.
There are also voices of doubt internationally and domestically, such as criticism of leaders invited to the summit, including some leaders with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland and Brazil, who doubt the true intentions of the Biden government to organize the summit.
The new German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democracy summit
The Chinese Foreign Ministry's statement on Saturday said that "Today's American democracy is in a pathological state, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, party confrontation, political polarization, social division, racial conflict, and economic inequality have become more and more severe." The United States' democracy is based on the "rich man's game" of capital.
President Biden said in his speech that "as leaders of the government, we have a responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the guardrails of democracy, promote reform, achieve transparent accountability governance, and better resist the forces of authoritarianism and shocks, and those who want to pursue power nakedly before the public interest. "
He stressed that democracy is not something that is taken for granted, "We must constantly update it in each generation, and in my opinion, this is the decisive challenge of this era."
Mr. Biden also said that global democracy and human rights "are under sustained and troubling challenges, and democracy needs heroes to defend it."
The United States has promised to launch a year-long action after the Democratic Summit, including a 4.244 billion dollar initiative to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent news media.
The United States hopes that countries will make specific public commitments before the 2022 Democracy Summit, which will be held at the end of 2022, to improve their democratic system.
Biden said, "Let's all countries implement our commitments and report our progress next year."
Well, I only fear that he sent the wrong address.
Dayang Restaurant (Wudaoqiao Store)
Mint environment: Average [service bell] service: The food is served quickly "Gufamala cake" my must-order dish Gufamala cake is too fragrant and too soft and too delicious😋 If you like desserts, you must try "Dongjiang...
The taste is good, the meat is good, and the service is enthusiastic.
It has been a long time since I came to Changsha, and the fruit loofah is still so good to drink and the real material is so good. The first time I tried the roast pork bun, it was the southern taste of soft flour!
The fried rice was just right, the portion was very generous, the signature chicken wings were as good as ever, and the soup was also very good. The treatment of the celery was also quite...
The food was great, the service was great, the meat was great.
The old store of Jinchang is also a popular existence many years ago, and the Dongshan Xiao Lou, the wooden floor.
It takes a long time to wait for the clay pot rice, and the clay pot is all cracked...
It has been a long time since I last went to eat at Dayang. The rise of various small shops has dispersed the customer flow.
It is rare to find a seat in the restaurant, and the quality of the food is no different from before.
Flavors loves meat, main dishes love
Jichang Waimai.
[Rice] Meal: This time the food was a little bit disappointing.
Three chickens: the side dishes are a bit too much, and the chicken meat is a bit too little.
The taste of this main dish is slightly off, and the salty taste is not enough, which highlights the sweetness, and everyone can imagine the sweet + various seasonings...
What is the red wine whiskey?
Everyone has different hobbies, some people like to collect, some people like to eat, of course, some people like to drink, and the red label whisky is one of the most popular Scottish whisky in the world, and the red label whisky has won the gold medal in the international wine competition.
Each bottle of red wine has its own unique flavor, but if you don't know how to taste it, you are wasting its flavor.
So, how do you drink a red label whiskey?
The editor briefly introduces it.
Red card whiskey drinking:
The Johnnie Walker Red Label is a blend of up to 35 whiskies from across Scotland, with a rich aroma and traditional Scottish whisky character, rich aroma with sweet and smoky notes.
The entrance is fresh and slightly herbal, with a strong smoky malt aroma.
The wine can be drunk straight or mixed with one's favorite drink.
Red wine whiskey has entered the domestic market to meet the taste of the Chinese people. Red wine whiskey + cola or Sprite or new energy drink has become a fashion that never fades.
These sweet-tasting drinks can not only neutralize the sour taste, but also bring pleasure to the eyes when added to the drink, and can change the taste of the drink visually.
The most traditional way to drink whiskey is with a slice of lemon and a cube of sugar (sugar can also be used).
The original red wine has a bit of sourness, and adding sugar can neutralize the sourness. Lemon will give the wine a fresh fragrance, of course, the sweetness can be adjusted according to one's personal preference.
The three are the best ways to drink red wine, and you can try them as a reference. I hope that my introduction can help you.
Education thinking: how university exams make "excellent students" and "poor students" get their due - Xinhua News Agency
Three Lanzhou Jiaotong University students wrote a letter to the school leaders to reflect their confusion about the university entrance examination, and proposed to increase the difficulty of the examination, change the examination questions, and make the examination truly reflect the actual level of students.
Indeed, for a long time, university exams have been a "hot topic."
In the university campus, students come from all over the country, with different abilities, and different learning levels. The learning situation is very different.
It is inevitable that there will be different feelings when assessing a group with such diverse features.
Of course, if the test questions are single-type and the repetition rate is high, the questions are too simple, and it is inevitable to have another different feeling.
Students who are not studious may be able to pass the exam by studying hard before the exam, and if they want to try other methods, they may be able to double their efforts.
In this way, there is a "stupid student" who can pass the exam even if he doesn't put in effort during class, or even get a high score; and there is a "smart student" who doesn't fall behind in class, and the homework and notes are all good, and the exam is not much higher than the "weird situation" .
It appears that the students at Lanzhou Jiaotong University have reflected the problems in the college entrance examination, and this is not limited to Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
From this perspective, the students who wrote letters to the three of them should be praised.
In fact, many university students are aware of the phenomenon of studying hard, trying various methods to obtain exam questions from teachers, and trying to cover the exam range to get “special tutoring” before the exam. Even in the exam, there are cases of cheating and asking teachers to raise their hands after the exam.
In my opinion, as a teaching quality evaluation-oriented measure, it is more about the comprehensive grasp of teachers on teaching and learning, and on this basis, scientific questions.
At the undergraduate level, specialization begins, and many courses are based on basic knowledge.
Of course, whether or not to fully master the basic knowledge points of a subject is what the university exam will test.
The basic knowledge of undergraduate is mainly the basic theory and basic knowledge of the discipline, and the change space is not large, and it is basically fixed.
Like what the teachers said, "20 years ago, I learned the basic knowledge of mathematics, and now I am still learning, and it is still a focus."
But the knowledge points are basically unchanged, and it does not mean that the exam questions are single and the questions are repeated.
At many universities, exams are usually organized by a group of examiners, who are then coordinated by senior teachers in the subject. The marking of the exam is also carried out by all the teachers in charge of the subject, which helps to overcome the problem of exam repetition to a certain extent.
But it is necessary to make a set of test items that fit the actual situation of teaching and learning, and the difficulty of the test items is positively distributed according to the overall situation of students' learning, and it is necessary to comprehensively master the teaching situation and analyze the degree of students' learning comprehensively, so as to make the test items have a dynamic grasp of difficulty and type, which can highlight the examination of basic knowledge and cover the examination of ability, and at the same time innovate the design of test items.
Exams are the command rod of university education, and what kind of exams students will have will have corresponding preparation plans, and this will affect the effectiveness of university education in the long run.
Lanzhou University highly values the suggestions of students and has already deployed a rectification plan in the whole school.
Require each teaching unit to organize teachers to conduct a self-check on the comparison of teaching and course closing examination, formulate the examination paper and related system, and strengthen the supervision and inspection of the examination paper and examination process, and refine the grading of scores, and strengthen the comprehensive assessment of each link of course teaching.
From a mechanism perspective, the issues of single-type questions, repeated questions and so on are issues that need to be faced by university examination affairs. Of course, it is necessary to establish corresponding systems, but the effort is in daily life. Teachers need to have a comprehensive understanding of the teaching situation, not only to understand the teaching content, but also to understand the learning situation of students. Both sides need to eat through, and the teaching and learning will be better connected, and the exam will be more in line with the actual situation, so that "academic excellence" and "educational excellence" can be achieved, so that "academic excellence" and "educational excellence" can be achieved.
If I cannot change my store location, can I be delivered instead?
I don't have to give him another dime?
The orders have been delivered
It didn't work out
GPS? No, no, no
The wedding photography (Nanjie store) of Mrs. Jin has not yet opened a branch.
Because we didn't arrange the time well before, we changed the time twice. Lan Lan was very patient to arrange the time for us.
He later chose a good weather weekend to shoot.
The staff of Mrs. Jin's office, whether it is a consultant, a makeup artist or a photographer, are all very good.
That was my first time ever doing makeup, wow, I can't believe I'll look like this one day, haha.
Xiaojie and another sister (sorry, I can't remember her name) were very patient with their make-up, and their make-up was very natural.
The exterior shots were taken in Jiangwan City, and fortunately the weather was good that day, so we didn't feel too cold when we were taking pictures. The makeup artist would occasionally check our clothes, headwear, and so on. If there was anything wrong, they would immediately help us to fix it.
The photographer is also very funny, and feels very happy after taking pictures for one day.
When selecting photos, we didn't want to delete too many because we had seen many examples online, but when we selected photos, we really didn't want to add any more, and there were only 24 photos in the package, none of which were added (I heard that my sister-in-law who took wedding photos in the same period as me added a thousand more photos in the package, and I was shocked. I was also afraid that I would choose too many photos)
Today, the photos were fixed, and Lan Lan sent them to me. I looked at them and there were two that I didn't like, and they immediately helped me to re-edit them.
I'm so happy with our photos, they're so simple and fresh, just what I wanted.
I sincerely recommend that everyone go to the wedding photo of Mrs. Han Xin.
Set price: 3999 yuan
Mrs. Jin is grateful for your sincere wishes for your happiness and prosperity!
How much is this set?
That $32 can only be used if it meets certain conditions
That's fine, no need to refund
Your rider says he can't find it
Can't find
But I don't understand what he's saying in English.
The editors have brought us the best Omega mechanical watch.
How good is the Omega mechanical watch?
1. Swiss OmegaOMEGA碟飞系列情侣对表，自动机械男表，石英女表
Recommended reason: Switzerland is known for its timeless artistry, simple elegance, and understated elegance. It is suitable for both formal and casual occasions.
The couple style expresses the sweet love between the two, and is always together, and the delicate pointer makes people fall in love at first sight.
No price
2. Swiss OMEGA (OMEGA) Seamaster 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001 men's watch quartz women's watch 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Recommendation: Swiss-made, must be a masterpiece, Omega watches, slender and elegant gold-plated watches, couples' watches, which can both show the noble identity and show the sweet love.
The dial design is designed to make the time scale clearer, and the table uses the popular blue table. The overall design is simple and clear.
The brand OMEGA, the strap is made of steel, the dial color is blue, the movement is mechanical (automatic), the waterproof function is 30 meters, the display type is pointer, the national insurance is national insurance, the strap interface type is flat interface, the material of the strap is steel, the size of the dial is 39.5mm for men and 27.4mm for women, the size of the strap interface is 20mm, the type of buckle is butterfly buckle, the material of the lens is artificial sapphire crystal, and there are currently 3 reviews, with a 100% positive rating.
3. Swiss Omega OMEGA De Ville Co-Axial 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Recommended reason: Swiss made, quality standard, the movement accuracy of this Omega watch is very high, the couple design, simple and elegant appearance, the passage of time from the pointer edge to the edge, it is always moving at a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, and release the charm of the wrist.
4, Swiss OMEGA watch, Deville series, automatic mechanical watch, men's watch, fashion quartz watch, couple's watch, a pair of watches
Omega couple watches, a pair of watches, a deposit
Recommendation: Swiss-made, naturally it is of superb quality. Omega is elegant, simple and understated, yet very attractive. It can be worn for commuting or formal occasions.
The fashion atmosphere, the sense of beauty, and the elegant temperament of the lady, the jump of the pointer, I see you with a new heart.
The watch is made of steel band, mechanical (automatic), buckle type folding, waterproof function up to 30 meters, male size 39.5, female size 27.4, pointer type display, national warranty, table top material stainless steel, table color white, brand Omega, table band interface type flat interface, table bottom material precision steel, table top color white, brand Omega, table band interface size 18mm, table glass material artificial sapphire crystal glass, currently has more than 20+ reviews, and has a 100% good rating.
So I'm going to go back and give you the curry base?
I only received half
There were six boxes but none of them had been delivered.
The company has overtime, and there is no lunch. They want to order take-out, but who knows if it will be cancelled
You are Zheng Min, and this is your second week in Japan.
You're walking down the street and suddenly someone's following you, and you're running as fast as you can to get away.
That person followed behind you: "Miss! Please wait!" (The entire conversation was in Japanese.) You stopped at the convenience store entrance.
"Miss... I am a director, and I think you are very beautiful. Are you interested in participating in a reality show?"
You're confused, afraid it's a scam.
He gave you a business card, and you found out he was the director of a major Japanese entertainment company.
"If you have time, we can talk about the remuneration at the company. I'm sure it won't be much."
He came to the company in a hurry and said that he saw you on the street at a glance and hoped that you would come to participate.
You think you're going to lose nothing, but you can still make money, so you sign the contract.
It is a large-scale love reality show, divided into two parts.
The early stage will allow celebrities and ordinary people to get along in real life, and cultivate tacit understanding.
Later, they will enter the game together to complete the level.
Next week is the official recording, and you don't know who your partner will be, and what interesting things will happen.
So, is the system able to see the new orders?
So what will happen to that rider?
I thought I couldn't accept the order for more than 20 minutes without delivery
3,200 newborn babies without birth certificates due to fake paper shortage
(Kuala Lumpur, Nov 11) The National Registration Department of Sabah said that due to the shortage of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has been unable to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October, and the cumulative number of affected people has reached 3,200.
However, the head of the bureau, Keriaminus, assured that all babies who have applied for birth certificates have their data recorded in the system and will be issued after the counterfeit paper is delivered next week.
He explained at a press conference that the problem of the printing of fake news in Sabah newspapers lasted for more than 10 months.
He said the issue has been around for two months and Sarawak is also facing the same problem.
"One reason is that the Chinese manufacturers who produce customized anti-counterfeiting paper have been affected by the epidemic, resulting in a delay in delivery to our country. "
He explained that the paper used for the Sabah newspaper is different from that used in other states, so it is not possible to borrow stock from other states.
Kaluaminus revealed that the latest batch of anti-counterfeiting paper had arrived in Kuala Lumpur on the 6th of this month and was handed over to the printing company on the 8th for some printing work.
"The shipment will be sent to Kuala Lumpur on Thursday, and the final stage of printing will be completed immediately in Sabah, and it is estimated that it will take two working days (December 20) to be delivered to the applicant. "
"We will notify applicants to go to the local offices to pick up the birth certificates. "
He added that Sabah has issued 24801 birth certificates this year.
From 7pm to now
Is that about to happen?
I mean food
I'm across the road from #PRS_ORG#
Well, thank you, because the restaurant says it's ready.
The commentator of the People's Daily commented that the 14th National Congress of the Communist Party of China has achieved a good start - - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2020 - The People's Daily Comment on December 12, 2020: "The 14th Five-Year Plan" has achieved a good start - - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference
"Achieved a good start to the 14th Five-Year Plan" and highly evaluated the achievements of China's economic and social development in the past year at the Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting, deeply summarized the economic work in 2021, analyzed the current economic situation in depth, and made major deployments for the economic work in 2022, providing a direction for our economic work in 2022 and providing a fundamental principle.
We celebrate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China and formally announce the completion of the construction of a moderately prosperous society, the realization of the first centenary goal, and the opening of the construction of a modern socialist country and the march towards the second centenary goal.
We held the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, summarized the major achievements and historical experience of the Party over the past hundred years, and passed the historic resolution of the Communist Party of China Central Committee on the major achievements and historical experience of the Party over the past hundred years, which is a political declaration of the Communist Party of China in the new era to remember the original aspiration and mission, to adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is an action guide to realize the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
In the past year, the world has witnessed a once-in-a-century global change and the outbreak of the novel coronavirus pneumonia, and the external environment has become more complex and severe. The tasks of prevention and control of the novel coronavirus pneumonia and economic and social development are extremely heavy and arduous.
Under the leadership of General Secretary Xi Jinping, the Central Committee of the Communist Party of China has always insisted on coordinating domestic and international affairs, insisted on working in a steady manner, dealt with the century-old change and the century-long epidemic, coordinated the prevention and control of the epidemic and the development of the economy and society, accelerated the construction of a new development pattern, strengthened macro-policy cyclic adjustment, and focused on promoting economic sustainable and healthy development, and focused on deepening reform and opening up and completing the difficult task of reform and development. The Party and the country have achieved new major achievements in various fields.
The implementation of the 14th Five-Year Plan has made a good start, and an important aspect is that the construction of a new development pattern has taken a new step, and high-quality development has achieved new results.
China's economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained the leading position in the world, and the characteristics of strong resilience, great potential, and abundant power have been continuously demonstrated; the national strategic science and technology power has been accelerated to grow, and major innovative achievements have emerged in succession; the resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, and exports have increased in quality and quantity, and the structure has continued to optimize; the new impetus represented by new industries, new businesses, and new models has continued to grow; the reform and opening-up has been promoted in depth, and efforts have been made to break through the bottlenecks of matching supply and demand and the flow of factors; the people's livelihood has been effectively guaranteed, the employment scale has continued to expand, and the income of residents has grown in line with the growth of the economy; the construction of ecological civilization has been continuously promoted, the work of peaking carbon emissions and carbon neutrality has been coordinated, the pace of green and low-carbon transformation has been steady, and new achievements have been made in ecological environmental protection.
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Party Central Committee with Comrade Xi Jinping at its core, the result of the scientific guidance of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for a New Era, and the result of the whole party and the whole nation’s concerted efforts and hard work.
Practice once again proved that the Party has established the core position of the Party Central Committee and the core position of the whole Party, and has established the guiding position of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for the New Era, which is of great significance to the development of the Party and the country in the new era, and to the advancement of the cause of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Xi Jinping, as the core of the Party Central Committee and the core of the whole party, has led the whole party to sail the ship of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era, and the whole party, all ethnic groups and the people of the whole country have united and worked hard. We will definitely overcome all difficulties and risks, and create a new era and make a new historical achievement in the new journey of building a modern socialist country.
The 20th National Congress of the Party will be held next year, which is a major event in the political life of the party and the state.
To promote the great spirit of the founding of the Party, to adhere to the overall tone of work, to fully and accurately implement the new development concept, to accelerate the construction of a new development pattern, to comprehensively deepen reform and opening up, to adhere to innovation-driven development, to promote high-quality development, to adhere to the main line of supply-side structural reform, to coordinate epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, to coordinate development and security, to continue to do "six stable" and "six guarantee" work, to continuously improve people's livelihood, and to strive to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable and prosperous social environment, and a political environment that is clean and pure. We will definitely be able to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable and prosperous social environment, and a political environment that is clean and pure, and achieve excellent results at the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China.
Let us more closely unite around the Party Central Committee with General Secretary Xi Jinping as its core, strengthen the “four consciousnesses”, “four confidence”, and “two guarantees”, and continuously improve the political judgment, political insight, and political execution, so as to implement the decisions and deployments of the Party Central Committee on the ground, and continuously advance the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
I re-ordered with points, thank you.
Where is the address taken from?
I couldn't see the address
Download the SuNing YiGou APP
Follow Suning’s WeChat public account
Save money and share profits
Download the SuNing Financial APP
Follow the service number of Suning E-commerce
It is very convenient and the same as opening a computer, which has solved my problem of insufficient hard disk on my computer.
The new solid state hard drive that just arrived today cannot be read by the mobile solid state hard drive computer, cannot be recognized by the mobile solid state hard drive computer, and can be read by the U disk computer.
The robot is very light and easy to handle, with an elegant and aesthetic appearance.
I used it for a whole day, and the heat dissipation was very good, and I barely felt any heat. The running speed was very fast, and it killed 99% of the users in seconds when it started up.
The battery is also very powerful, and it should be fine for 9 hours of standby and 4 hours of use, in short, this price can buy this kind of quality of a machine, I feel very happy, and other functions and so on will be added later.
It looks very nice.
In terms of performance, we will evaluate after some time.
The machine is fast, bigger than expected, and the rendering effect is very good. I like it. I will wait and see after using it for a period of time.
It is not bad, and the serial number of the machine can be found in Hong Kong. The quality should be OK.
**Feels like a lot of weight, but it's actually not that heavy. It's a little bit bigger than a 15.6-inch screen, but it runs really stable and doesn't feel like it's lagging. The fan noise is great, and it feels like it won't make you feel like you're playing a game.
It was good and cheaper than the official flagship store, and they also gave me a backpack, which I thought was very good.
The store service is also good, reminding me to update my bios and open up ** in a timely manner.
Worth it!
Cooling effect: The cooling effect is very good, and the temperature is basically zero. The lightness degree: It is convenient to carry. The appearance material: The traditional design of Thinkpad is satisfactory.
The seller carefully checked the whole machine, all interfaces, no refurbished or used traces, and it was indeed a brand new US version, with the same configuration as the page.
Forgot to pack a backpack, so I immediately bought one for him, although it was not the original factory backpack, but the service and follow-up were enough to prove that it was a good seller.
If friends need to buy a notebook, they can buy it again.
The appearance material: The appearance is atmospheric and the display effect: The screen resolution can be reached, the clarity is good, and the weight is light and thin: The heavier the thing is, the better it feels.
Heat dissipation effect: I tried it for the first time, and I will evaluate it later.
The keyboard is very good to type, and it also sent a mouse and a converter. This configuration is more economical than that of the national brand. In general, it is cheap and beautiful, and the performance of the machine can be evaluated after using it for a period of time.
This screen is so relaxing!
It is very easy to use, and I will review it after using it for a while!
Education information: Beijing compressed the proportion of 2016 early middle school entrance special talents-Xinhua News
On the 21st and 22nd, the entrance examination for middle school students in Beijing will be unified organized by the district education committee.
This year, each district in Beijing has reduced the proportion of special-admissions students, and the competition for special-admissions students has become more fierce.
For example, in the East District, the proportion of elementary school and junior high school special talents admitted this year is generally not more than 5% of the total number of enrollments in the district, and the number of planned enrollments is 380 people, and the admission rate is not more than 10% of the school's enrollment plan.
All students who have athletic, artistic, and technological talents and have registered online for the special entrance examination are eligible to take the special entrance examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the examination nearby, the East District continued the examination arrangement of last year and set up 1-2 examination locations in each school area, with a total of 13 examination locations.
The examination points are divided according to the examination area, and the examination time is divided according to the hour. On the day of the examination, students will enter the examination room in different examination areas according to the examination time and take the examination.
On May 23, the online examination center of the Education Recruitment Center published the list of students who passed the examination, and students can check the examination results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
No food received
The key is that I haven't eaten dinner tonight.
If you don't get it, say it early
Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee President: Believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Sarajewo, December 11 (Xinhua) - The president of the Bosnian Olympic Committee, Kvesic, recently said that Bosnia is looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics, and believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period of time.
On the previous day, the Chinese ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Qi Ping, met with the president of the Bosnian Olympic Committee, Kvesic, at the Olympic Center in Sarajevo.
When he met with the delegation, Kwieciszewski praised the relations between Poland and Belarus and said that he had visited China in 2008 during the Beijing Summer Olympics and was deeply impressed by the excellent organization work of the Chinese side. He believed that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period of time; Belarus is looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics, and the Belarus Olympic Committee is actively organizing the participation of the delegation; Belarus hopes to use this opportunity to carry out more extensive exchanges and cooperation in the sports field with China.
Ji Ping said that the two countries have a special "Olympic bond".
The 1984 Sarajevo Winter Olympics was successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympics will open the curtain, presenting a simple, safe and wonderful grand event to the world.
We look forward to deepening exchanges and cooperation in the preparation of winter sports competitions, athlete training and other aspects between the two countries, and the Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina will continue to play the role of a bridge to promote the deepening of people-to-people and cultural exchanges between the two countries, so that the people of the two countries can “go together towards the future”, and wish the Bosnian athletes to achieve good results in the Beijing Winter Olympics.
Before meeting, the BHOC held the "Best Athlete of the Year" award ceremony, and Qi Ping, as a special guest, presented the award to the BHOC's best young athlete.
The video of the Beijing 2022 Winter Olympics was played in the venue.
Disappointing
Will you refund me?
It's not good enough! The shipping fee is 20 yuan
There's no way! Ask that restaurant
Thanks for following, of course some riders did a great job
Chocolate Obsession [French] by Dominique Ennou, Xiaoxia Miao, Shanghai Science and Technology Press【Original book, full discount】
The original book supports seven days no reason to return and exchange
My grandmother's New Year's Eve says that she sings and plays the guitar at night. The air is clear and the mountains are far away. My grandfather is a stupid child. My grandmother lives in a strange town called Guli. There is a piece of chocolate and a bowl of dumplings on the table. 2022
Nola Books: The Crying Chocolate, The Thief's Little Handwritten Pinyin Version, Zhang Qiusheng, the original second and third grade, the original classic story book set, children's literature, primary school out-of-school book works
【佳英财图书】2022大阅小森百班千人二年级奶奶的除夕夜一块巧克力二十四节气爷爷是个笨小孩我的奶奶住在古里古怪镇饺子和汤
The complete works of Roald Dahl, including Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, James and the Giant Peach, and Matilda, translated into Chinese.
Volume 13, a wonderful fox father, the chocolate factory of Charlie, the collection of works of Roald Dahl, children's reading stories, 9-12 years old, second and fifth grade of elementary school, non-accented version, Matilda
The terrifying science series consists of 72 volumes, the classic mathematics series consists of 12 volumes, the classic science new knowledge, the natural exploration, the electric shock, the chocolate mystery, the important mathematics, and the 3rd, 4th, 5th and 6th grade extra-curricular reading books.
Some books are sold at a higher price than the price, and it is recommended to be cautious when bidding
Chocolate in the office: seven tricks for work and happiness (de) written by Wei Xin and translated by Chen Bao, published by Yunnan Science and Technology Publishing House.
【Fast invoice, place an order, quality after-sales, support 7 days no reason to return and exchange】
Nursery Rhymes, Volume 6, Grandfather says, Hundreds of children, two-year-old class, a chocolate, grandpa is a stupid child, says that learning to sing and dance the twenty-four solar terms, Qing Dong see the far mountain dumplings, and the dumpling picture book my grandmother
Nola Books: Original, Little Monster Ula, A Natural History Beginner's Picture Book Set of 8 Books, Exploring a Chocolate Factory, Transforming Vehicles, The Great Luggage Adventure, Picture Storybooks 3-4-5-6 Years
[Nola Books] Original, you don't know coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciating, food lovers, food culture, interesting and fashionable lifestyle encyclopedia
Suitable for elementary school students from grades 3 to 5, story books, summer reading books, and extra-curricular reading books.
【Nola Books】Original 3-Volume Set of French Blue-Ray Dessert Cookbook, Chocolate Dessert Class, World Dessert Master's Creative Works, 100 Basic and Beginner Tutorials on How to Make Cakes
The Complete Collection of Roald Dahl's Works, including Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, The BFG and More Children's Stories for 6-12 Year Olds
Hello, this order has been waiting for a long time
It has been repeatedly delayed.
Thank you
Please help me to cancel, every order needs to be re-ordered
He needs to order, then I'll have credit?
Did they miss this delivery?
How much can I send?
There is no way
The code includes four $20 off discounts
#NAME# said to me to re-order.
I have been re-ordering again and again, and I have received so much money.
But I ordered at 1:30.
48-hour negative nucleic acid test, set up "buffer zone" and the Ministry of National Defense issued a requirement to strengthen the prevention and control of the epidemic in coastal cities - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporter Dong Ruifeng and Gu Tiancheng) On December 11, the State Council issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of COVID-19 in border cities, requiring that personnel leaving land border cities (excluding those connected with Hong Kong and Macao) must hold a negative nucleic acid test report within 48 hours, and personnel arriving in land border cities must perform at least one nucleic acid test after arrival.
According to the notice, the time range for the above requirements is from the date of determining the port city range and announcing it, from March 15, 2022, to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice proposed that conditional port cities may study setting up a buffer zone for epidemic prevention and control within their jurisdictions.
According to the relevant person in charge of the National Health Commission's Disease Prevention and Control Bureau, for some border cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the local economy, and the two sides of the border people often go back and forth.
The implementation of differentiated management policies has changed the one-line prevention and control line into two-lines of prevention and control, which is expected to achieve the transfer of checkpoints and the compression of the risk of the spread of the epidemic, so as to achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and the minimum social cost.
Recently, there have been a number of domestic cluster outbreaks in China, all of which were caused by the entry of foreign epidemics through ports of entry.
The notice pointed out that some issues such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and early warning, the lack of implementation of high-risk personnel closed-loop management, the formality of regular nucleic acid testing, the failure to kill pathogens in each link of cold chain items, the lack of standardization in the management of concentrated isolation places, and the lack of scientific and precise emergency response to the epidemic were exposed.
The notice requires efforts in nine aspects, including improving the mechanism for epidemic prevention and control in coastal cities, strengthening the epidemic monitoring and early warning system, and implementing border control measures, etc. to fill the gaps and weaknesses in the prevention and control of coastal cities, and to make sure that all prevention and control work is meticulous and scientific and accurate. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must remain vigilant and make sure that all prevention and control work is carried out in a meticulous and scientific manner. We must
The notice stressed that the cities along the border should study and deploy the work of epidemic prevention and control and people's livelihood protection synchronously, publish and open the hotline for people's livelihood protection in a timely manner, regularly check the potential risks of basic livelihood supplies and prices, and timely solve and actively respond to the prominent problems reflected by the public.
According to the notice, the mentioned port cities include the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the open land, water and air ports are located, the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities, districts, counties) where the counties (cities,
Color: As shown in the picture (color difference is inevitable in shooting, the closest color will show, outdoor light will cause the clothing color to become brighter, please consult in advance before buying)
This item is vintage, and first-time buyers of vintage items should search for "vintage" or "vintage" on Baidu.
It's a privacy issue.
Vintage items are inevitably going to have minor flaws, so if you're going to buy vintage products, you should be prepared for that. If you're a perfectionist, you should be careful when you're buying, and I will point out any obvious flaws, which is the nature of vintage products. I think good things don't care about that little bit of impact!
The store does not accept returns or exchanges.
Vintage, retro, and design all have a nostalgic feel to them, which is why people love vintage. It's the same with its age and its texture!
So girls who can't control themselves shouldn't say that the clothes are old, they can only say that you are not suitable!
There is no risk-free way to buy online, and shopping needs to be careful.
If the items are not suitable for the buyer or they do not like them for any reason, they can be returned to the store for resale. Once the items are sold, they cannot be returned or exchanged. Thank you for your cooperation!
On June 11, 2021, a part of the circle was sold out.
Pay attention to the number when placing an order, and antiques cannot be returned or exchanged.
Buying instructions
The goods sold in the store are not returnable
Please take a few minutes to read the purchase instructions
The products in the store may have a slight color difference due to the display screen and light. Please consider carefully before purchasing. Color difference is not a reason for return or exchange.
The store does not accept the reason of exchange and bad review for the style and style that is different from what is imagined.
The sizes are all measured with a ruler, and there must be an error, but we believe that the error is very small, and if you receive the wrong size, it is not possible to exchange it, so we must consider it carefully in advance.
If you have any problems, please contact me as soon as possible, I will do my best to solve them, and if any malicious reviews are posted, I will report them to the end.
We will carefully check every item before it is sent out, and quality will not be an issue.
Please confirm receipt and give us a rating within 48 hours after receiving the clothes. Please be considerate of our hard work.
Oil pipeline video exposes the truth of the US military's 20-year bloodthirsty slaughter - Xinhua News Agency
(Video source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary named "Killing Machine" on the oil platform attracted widespread attention.
The film tells the story of the United States' "war on terror" in Afghanistan, which forced the output of American democracy through war, waged war for 20 years, was bloodthirsty and cruel, and committed various inhumane crimes.
Using unmanned aerial vehicles to attack hospitals, schools and other civilian places, and distort human nature, to establish a murder group.
Over the past 20 years, the US has killed tens of thousands of Afghan civilians.
The US military applied various cruel punishments and humiliation to the "criminals".
The more human rights violations, the more Afghans' hatred.
As the video says, the American "war on terror" has become "more and more terrorized."
War has not brought peace, democracy, prosperity and hope to the Afghan people. It has only left a country in ruins, and countless killings and destruction.
Click the video to let us together expose the truth of the United States' "anti-terrorism" and blood-thirsty killings, and expose the hypocrisy and falsehood of American democracy!
By chance, I saw an article like this, talking about why the logistics company in the bonded warehouse should pack the cans, although the cans belong to the deep processing industry and are not in the scope of operation of the bonded logistics company. Here is an article that may explain why the customer wants to do this.
I visited many milk powder factories and came into contact with many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the raw materials of powdered milk in the bag and the one in the bottle are exactly the same, and there is no difference.
So, everyone will ask: Why is the shelf life of a bag one year, while the shelf life of a carton is two years or more?
Or ask: why is the price of listening and packaging so different?
In fact, many consumers or mothers think that because the raw materials are different, the quality will be much better.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but people think that the good ones are expensive.
Consumers have also said that after eating, they have said that the taste or taste of the packaging is different!
Now I will tell you the reason why the cost of hearing aids is so high, where is the cost coming from?
Why is the price of their raw materials so different?
Because most manufacturers consider that if the packaging price is too high, consumers will find it difficult to accept, which means that the manufacturer's profits are low, or even no profits. So, what will the manufacturer do to survive?
So they have a big increase in pricing to ensure their profit space.
Therefore, most manufacturers are promoting the use of hearing aids, rather than the use of bags.
And the cost of advertising every year for so many manufacturers is tens of millions or even hundreds of millions, where does this money come from?
Of course, everyone can understand.
As society develops, the promotion cost of the market, such as the promotion personnel of the store, the display cost of the store, the gift cost of the product, and the advertising cost, etc., are also increasing continuously.
Therefore, various manufacturers are constantly adding new products, and their prices are also constantly rising. This is a new product that comes out with the increase of market costs.
The main purpose is to get higher profits, and the cost of raw materials will not exceed 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that, in order to promote their own products, do not hesitate to hook up with the doctors of the hospital, and help them promote the products, from 30 yuan to 80 yuan.
And the relevant laws of China are absolutely not allowed to do this way of operation, in fact, this kind of operation is to defraud consumers.
It is suggested that people buy powder in a bag under the premise of having a can at home, which can save money and increase the storage and sealing properties of the powder, and has no effect on children.
There are some people who think that the shelf life of the listening is longer than that of the bag, but if the shelf life of the listening and the bag is the same after opening the bag, it is only that the bag is not easy to save and easy to change.
The food was late, and the food was cold, and after it was cold, it was dry and hard, and it was impossible to eat.
And the soup dripped as well.
He #PRS_ORG# will definitely be cold when he #PRS_ORG# the things he received from #PRS_ORG#.
I didn't get it!
#NAME# says you didn't bring anyone
We've been on the phone.
If you don't refund, I will report you.
Repeatedly using #PRS_ORG# today was the worst experience
Impossible to accept
Okay, you can
But also reminds the restaurant and the rider.
to avoid the same thing happening again.
I want to know the exact delivery time
That time kept getting delayed
I don't know when
Can I get my money back if I cancel the order?
How do I pay for the service?
One hour ago, a rider was confirmed.
I don't want to wait any longer
Don't scare people off the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
When you go to the book market, you can often feel the heat of successful academic books.
Today's success books often preach the "best principles" -- that is, they assume or imply that you can "do" it -- and then tell you what you need to do "to do it."
That is to say, it means bypassing the most important and fundamental link of "how to do it".
That's why these books all have a common characteristic — either they're done to the best of one's ability, or they're done with no effort at all; either they're 100, or they're 0; either you climb Mount Everest, or you just stay at home.
This "best practice" will make everyone admit that it is "absolutely correct", but 99% of people will be scared away before the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "you have to make a 180-degree turn and start over", which is exactly what many people's fatal weakness is.
For those who are stuck in their ways, refuse to change, and reject change, you will find yourself shouting "You need to change" right into their ears. It's an act of self-deception and playing the fool.
Most people will be afraid to show weakness in front of the word "change", and will hesitate to make a decision. Or they will make a decision to change, but they are brave enough to take the first step, but it is often short-lived, and it is difficult to maintain.
Ma Sanli's famous "From Tomorrow" is a classic of "universal humanity" best expressed in his performance.
The biggest problem with the "best principle" is that it is too high a threshold, and it often exceeds the limits of ordinary people, leaving most people "despairing" .
Perhaps, "the principle of the second best" is a way to make more ordinary people walk on the relative success road.
The core of the "next best thing" principle is "lowering the threshold" - - it encourages a "small wins make big wins" theory, that is, if you can't do 100, it's okay to do 1; because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Everest, it's okay to climb a small sand dune in front of your house, because it's always better than standing still.
In the end, doing something is always better than doing nothing.
Since the threshold was lowered, there are more opportunities for ordinary people to persevere, and the probability of success will increase as long as they persevere.
However, following the principle of "second best" is a longer journey.
In short, the "best principle" may sound like a rallying cry for everyone to succeed, but in the end, it can only motivate a few, while the "second best principle" can effectively motivate more people and benefit more people as much as possible.
Do I need to place another order now?
The phone rang unanswered.
It kept getting delayed.
Not yet delivered
When will it be delivered?
How can I contact you?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He missed two meals, but one order was completed.
I just wanted to ask, how do you get in touch with the rider?
The first rider told me that there would be another rider to send me.
The amount of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake increased by 0.71 million tons this year - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, 2019 (reporter Luo Xiaofei, Zhang Hongxiang) The reporter learned from the Qinghai Provincial Agriculture and Rural Affairs Department that the latest monitoring results show that the amount of bare carp resources in Qinghai Lake this year has increased by 0.71 million tons, reaching 10.85 million tons, which has increased by more than 40 times compared with the protection period in 2002.
The Qinghai Lake naked carp is a precious fish species in Qinghai Lake. It plays an important role in maintaining the ecological chain of "water-fish-birds" in Qinghai Lake and biodiversity.
In the 1960s and 1970s, the number of naked carp in Qinghai Lake was greatly reduced due to factors such as overfishing and the deterioration of the water environment of breeding grounds. In 2002, the amount of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake was only 2,592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as an endangered species in the Chinese Red List.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented the ban on fishing in lakes and the main rivers and tributaries of Qinghai Lake, and has prohibited the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial reproduction and the cleaning of the main inflow rivers of Qinghai Lake, as well as the design of scientific and reasonable “fish passage”, the resources of the naked carp in Qinghai Lake have been increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, deputy director of the Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs of Qinghai Province, introduced that up to now, the Qinghai Lake naked carp has been artificially bred and released into the lake more than 1.8 billion, and the contribution rate of the restoration of the resources of Qinghai Lake naked carp is more than 23%.
The Qinghai-Tibet Plateau and Qinghai Lake are important ecological barriers and water sources in China and Asia. Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological function area that controls the eastward spread of desertification in the west.
In the past two years, Qinghai has published notices of prohibition on fishing and hunting in key water areas of the Yangtze River, the Yellow River and Qinghai Lake, and has built a “one river, one river, one lake” comprehensive prohibition management system to protect the ecological environment of the Three Gorges region and Qinghai Lake, protect aquatic wild animals and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau.
I used my #PRS_ORG# Red credit card to spend more than $180 on food.
But the order did not deduct $20
The original software is free to try, and computers and mobile phones can be used without paper.
2022 Leaf South "Advanced English Translation Theory and Practice" (2nd Edition) Notes and Exam Questions Explanation/Master's Degree Examination Syllabus Guide Review Material Entrance Examination
2022 Leaf "Modern Television News" notes and homework (including typical questions) explanation/master's degree examination syllabus guidance material review materials entrance examination questions
The original mobile photography introduction, take a beautiful photo is very simple, the capture of the skills tutorial, the photography composition with the light technique, the mobile photography tutorial book, the app software photography post-processing
Quality books, original guarantee, quality service, timely delivery and worry-free after-sales.
Red Hat Linux System Administration Guide (CD-ROM Included)
The King of Animal Novels, Shen Shixi, has a collection of books: The Tiger and the Golden Leaves [If you want to buy a group, please contact customer service]
The information of the books is collected and uploaded by the software, and the information is correct if there is any error. Please do not shoot if you mind!
If you have any questions, please contact our online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag, and it was cold outside
So, is the take-out packaged in a bag?
We only saw one bag
I wonder if it was lost or stolen, thanks.
It's been an hour and it hasn't been delivered.
I just read a fake example article that was too long.
To the men who don't know.
Most girls experience their first period at some point between the ages of 13 and 15, and stop menstruating around the age of 50.
After that, it will be more regular to visit the doctor once a month, under the premise of good physical health.
But it is not regular enough to be able to accurately predict, and it is necessary to prepare in advance for about a week or so, and sometimes the luck is bad and it will flip over (suddenly prepare a few days in advance).
The length of time, the amount of blood, and the severity of the period vary from person to person, and some people may have a period for three days, while others may have a period for a week; some people have a light flow, while others have a heavy flow; some people have no reaction, while others are in so much pain that they need to be taken to the hospital; the pain of the period changes over time, and it is not uncommon for a period to become less painful over time.
The menstrual cycle cannot be controlled, and there is blood for 24 hours from beginning to end. The only thing that can be done is to use sanitary napkins or sanitary towels to suck blood to prevent it from reaching the clothes and chairs.
The main cause of dysmenorrhea is the secretion of prostaglandins, and it is effective to relieve the pain of the month at the beginning of the menstrual period, but it is of no use after the onset of dysmenorrhea.
Before the period, due to the excessive release of progesterone and the accumulation of blood in the uterus, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If you have a period about two weeks later, you will come to the clinic within two days.
The sanitary pad should be changed once every two to three hours, otherwise it is easy to breed bacteria, and the worst case is to change it once a day, which is 6 times a month, that is, 42 pieces. If you add the pre-prepared pieces, it may be up to 50 pieces per month. It is not used every month.
(Here, it is not necessary to change the sanitary towel every time, and it can be changed about five to six hours, and the longest is eight hours)
The menstrual cycle hormone may be more irritable, and the ovulation period will also be unstable due to the change of hormones in the body, which is very unlucky, and it will give itself a stumbling block.
But the official crime rate data shows that women have a high ability to control emotions, and will not use emotional problems as an excuse.
Menses is not just blood, it contains shed endometrial tissue.
The inner lining of the uterus is the thinnest after the menstrual cycle ends, and gradually becomes thicker, which can be understood as the uterus is like a house, and each month it builds a house (the inner lining thickens) to prepare for guests, and if there are no guests, it will all be torn down (the menstrual cycle ends) and a new house will be built the next month.
Menstruation is very inconvenient, and has lasted for several decades, with 24 hours of bleeding every month, and abdominal pain and back pain, who would want to go through this?
But people are born because their mothers went through their menstrual cycle. The menstrual cycle is to prepare you for the house you will live in for 10 months when you first come to this world. We should all thank our mothers for their regular and healthy menstrual cycle.
Women have been repressed for a long time, and society has brainwashed women that it is dirty, shameful, and everyone thinks that is the way it is, but times have changed.
If anyone thinks that menstruation is disgusting, or that the female body is disgusting because it is preparing for life, then they should not say it out loud in public. Girls should stand up, they have never experienced it, and these men will never understand. It is incomprehensible how they can be so ungrateful, and how they can want their own children?
Finally, try the sanitary napkins, they are really useful.
Today is the Winter Solstice Festival, and it is disappointing to send it wrong
In addition, we need to order food for the children to eat.
I hope that the store will check the products in a busy time
Is it a leak in the foot bath?
Choosing a suitable foot bath can have a good effect on foot massage and health care. Today, the editor of Guomei will answer this question for you, hoping to help friends.
As people's health awareness has increased, foot bath basins have become more and more popular with consumers, and a large number of products of different levels have emerged in the market, ranging from hundreds of yuan to thousands of yuan. This has given consumers a lot of choice space.
In the relevant data surface, compared with traditional home appliances, the sales of health care home appliances such as hot tubs are booming, but the hot tubs do not have a specific industry standard, so there is a certain safety hazard.
"It's really dangerous to soak your feet in the electric water!"
Mr. Li told the reporter that recently, he bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift, but his father felt his feet were numb when he took a bath.
Mr. Li first thought that the vibration function of the foot bath was causing the vibration, but he did not expect that after turning off the vibration function, his father still felt his feet and legs were numb.
Mr. Li tried the electric pen, and the electric pen actually lit up. Mr. Li was surprised to find that the water in the bathtub actually had electricity.
Later, he contacted the merchant, and the merchant's attitude was good, even though he canceled the bathtub. Mr. Li was still unhappy.
He found that the hot tub, which has been popular for a long time, has no clear and detailed industry regulations on the setting of the highest temperature, the suitability for different people, and the guarantee of harmlessness.
However, in general, the hot tubs are not likely to have electrical problems, but there may be some products that are not strictly inspected at the factory.
Therefore, when purchasing, choose a split-level bathtub.
Water and electricity separation is completely safe.
You can also take a pencil test at any time.
The 13th provincial tea exhibition opened - view point - Hunan Daily Net - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2019 (Full media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, reporter, Liu Xiaoling, photographer, Li Jian) Today, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and the New Huzhou Red Tea Promotion Conference were held at the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center. The exhibition of the tea industry, the innovation of tea technology, the promotion of tea culture, and the acceleration of the target of the billion-dollar tea industry.
Vice Chairman of the China National Cooperative Federation, Hu Shunjie, and Vice Chairman of the Provincial People's Congress, Ye Hong, attended the opening ceremony.
Prof. Liu Zhonghua, an academician of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, made a solemn introduction at the opening ceremony: The source of Lake Red Tea has injected new power into the “Five Colors of Xiang Tea” with the rise of red tea.
In recent years, the provincial party committee and provincial government have vigorously supported the development of the tea industry, promoted the construction of the billion-dollar Xiang tea industry, and formed the "three Xiang and four water and five colors" development pattern.
The tea industry in the province has been innovating, with green tea, black tea, and red tea as the main types of tea, and the main producing areas of tea have been promoting the integration of tea tourism, which is helping to increase the income of many tea farmers.
The feng shui wheel turns, and red tea is making a comeback.
According to experts in the tea industry in the province, after harvesting green tea, red tea, and black tea, tea farmers have an income throughout the year, and the value of the tea garden is constantly rising.
At the opening ceremony, the provincial leaders awarded the right to use the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark to enterprises that have obtained the right to use the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark. New Huzhou was proud of “Huzhou Red Tea”.
At the New House of Fujian Tea, a high mountain tea called "Ice and Spring" caught the eye of Fujian tea merchants, and they immediately placed an order.
Secretary Wang Jun of the provincial Tea Industry Association said that the current epidemic and other factors have affected the tea market to some extent, but from the tea exhibition, there are many highlights.
The new-style red tea is red, and it is infused with the connotation of tea culture. It is popular and the transaction is hot. The Xiang tea industry welcomes a new spring.
If these foods are not hot, can they be cancelled?
I didn't want it because I couldn't park underneath it, and he couldn't deliver it.
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be directly answered through perception.
Metaphysics is the basic laws of philosophy, aiming to explain the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation "形而上学" is derived from the phrase "形而上者谓之道，形而下者谓之器" in the "Yi Jing" (Book of Changes), which was translated into Japanese by Zenjiro Inoue (in the Meiji period) from the word "metaphysics."
The branches of metaphysics include ontology, natural theology and its extensions.
Ontology is "the study of what names represent real entities and what names represent concepts."
Theistic naturalism is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical basis is that all phenomena can be explained by natural reasons, which are proposed by philosophers who support science and evolution.
And the method of naturalism is to study God without words.
Spiritual philosophy is a branch of philosophy that studies the relationship between consciousness and the body, especially the brain.
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought on the relationship between the mind and the body.
The philosophy of knowledge is a branch of philosophy that explores the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is the systematic study and research of human moral life; here, ethics is defined as a set of rules that are accepted by a group of people or a culture.
It is mainly divided into moral philosophy (abstractly studying the theory of ethics or criticizing its essence) and normative ethics (evaluating various different moral views and providing moral standards for correct or wrong behavior.
It studies the moral behavior standards that people should follow, applies ethics (the academic study of applying ethical theories to real life situations, including bioethics, political ethics, etc.), and describes ethics (the collection of information about how people live and the summary from the observed styles).
It is not derived from the expected theory, but from the actual moral agents' choices and the real choices observed, which resulted in all the moral factors of the social group. It discussed the ethical views of the social group.
The history of ethics includes Greek and Roman ethics, medieval Christian ethics.
The first part: the ethical ideas of humanism, with representatives such as Walter and Merton.
The second part: the ethical ideas of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
Part three: Political ethics, represented by the likes of Machiavelli, and modern ethics (17-18th century, British empiricism, represented by Hume, 17-18th century, European rationalism, represented by Spinoza, 18th century, French enlightenment, represented by Voltaire, 18-19th century, German academy, represented by Kant and Hegel, 18-19th century, British utilitarianism, represented by Bentham and Mill, 19th century, British evolutionism, represented by Spencer and Huxley, late 19th century, German new Kantianism, represented by Kierkegaard and Nietzsche, late 19th century, new Hegelianism, represented by Thomas Hill Green
Logic is a discipline that studies "principles and standards of valid reasoning and proof."
Logic usually consists of three parts: inductive reasoning, deductive reasoning, and abductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and non-formal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that studies the essence and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, which is food that was left over
Chè, born in the year of the sheep, in the month of the sheep, is suitable for the sheep, and is known as "the uncle of the sheep".
He is known in the industry as a "suspense genius" and claims to be "good at telling the truth in a serious manner."
"Black Light" is also known as "China's Strange Stories" and "The Strange Stories of China". "Suspicion Genius" Yang Xingao uses his new work "Black Light" to take you into the marrow of Chinese folk customs. What are the legends that have been passed down to this day, behind which there is a beautiful and touching love and hatred duet?
"Travellers on a different path" Nan Xiaoluo and Yue Wuhua have once again opened up a journey of investigation, and their identities are about to be revealed.
"Mystery genius" Yang Xingao white hair accumulated millions of books to donate!
The brand new work after the "Chinese Miscellany Record" is the continuation of the unfinished story of "Thai Miscellany Record" and "Indian Miscellany Record" with the same author and the same protagonist!
He gave me one thing, and I had to pay for a McChicken.
You call the restaurant to have them deliver.
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I'll spend so much money to call for take-out
Ding Zilin: To a friend.
I would like to express my sincere gratitude to all my friends who have provided humanitarian assistance to me over the past 30 years, especially since I issued a humanitarian appeal on behalf of myself in January 1994. This assistance has never been interrupted.
Nowadays, most of the deceased's old parents have already passed away, and the orphans have grown up to have their own families and jobs.
Your efforts have helped us through the most difficult moments of our lives.
The coronavirus pandemic is sweeping the world, and most of the donors are already retired.
Therefore, I earnestly request that you stop giving us trouble—the humanitarian donation for the mother group of Tiananmen Mothers, which should have been completed long ago.
I will always remember your love and I believe your deeds will be recorded in history.
Due to various reasons, I can only express my wishes in this way, please forgive me!
Please accept my sincere blessings.
Tao said: "I would like to take this opportunity to introduce the history of the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota Chinese Democratic Foundation (MCDF) for 32 years in humanitarian relief.
During the humanitarian relief process, the United States-China Democracy and Human Rights Project and the Minnesota China Democracy and Human Rights Foundation are parallel organizations, and the implementers often cross paths.
(Apple Daily photo: The website of the Mother of Tiananmen Square is managed by a potter.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
The relief funds often cannot be delivered smoothly to the victims of the June 4 incident.
In 1994, Ding teacher suggested that a special group be established to receive and distribute relief funds.
In 1998, MCDF established the "Six Four Orphan Education Fund" and has been executing it for 11 years. In 2009, MCDF then established the "Six Four Orphan Hardship Relief Fund" and has been executing it until now.
The funds for these projects are mainly from campus and social donations in 1989, individual generous donations, and the support of the Democratic Progressive Party's Democracy Fund.
Since 2018, it has also received support from the Research Foundation for Correction and Rehabilitation.
It was only until last year, 31 years later, that the victims of the June 4 Incident finally received a donation from Hong Kong, which was part of the donations collected in the name of the June 4 Incident.
During this period, China Human Rights also independently carried out its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding has suspended donations for the 64th anniversary of the founding of the People's Republic of China, considering the donors, and we are indeed some retired people with limited income. We would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding for his "letter to friends."
We will respect the decision of the affected people and terminate the project within two years, and immediately resume it when needed.
We also express our gratitude and respect to those who have been steadfast in their generosity and bravery in delivering humanitarian aid for many years.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: droplet chip 1, droplet chip 2, droplet chip 3, droplet chip 4, droplet chip 5, droplet chip 6, droplet chip 7, droplet chip 8, double-layer droplet
Thank you for choosing our products. Please spend 5 minutes to carefully read the following content before using our chips:
After opening the box, please check that the goods are complete.
If you have any problems, please contact customer service as soon as possible.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, and should not be exposed to solvents that react with PC.
Do not use a syringe to directly inject the chip, otherwise it is easy to leak.
Before shipping, the microfluidic chip is tested with pure water at 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth).
The chips on the glass substrate are tested at 800mbar (100um channel) before shipment, and please be careful not to collide with sharp objects during the use of the glass substrate, otherwise the substrate will be damaged.
During use, please consider the viscosity of the solution and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
We recommend a flow rate of 150ul/min or less for the aqueous phase and 50ul/min or less for the oil phase when using the injection pump.
Based on the actual viscosity of the sample liquid, increase the value of the flow rate parameter from slow to fast.
After the experiment is completed, please clean the internal channels in time to avoid blockage.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be reused.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be replaced.
If you need a microfluidic chip with greater pressure or flow rate, please contact our customer service to customize.
The normal delivery cycle of chips is within one week, and the inventory can be shipped within 24 hours after the goods are sold. Please consult with customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip with the sample system, you can refer to the following link https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873 or search for the "microbiota" public account for more help.
You can also visit our website (http://www.mesobiosys.com) to download our brochure and learn more about our products.
For more information about our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm across the road from #PRS_ORG#
Hello
Please ask, the order time is constantly extended
How long will it take to get there?
The original booking said 16:10-16:30.
I waited until 7:30 to see if it could be delivered
Where is Saint Street?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to Saint's Street?
What is the current situation of the order?
I entered it back in December.
So, this month you can enjoy $20 discount with #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
I didn't receive the order, can you help me check, is the rider still on the road?
Hi, can you help me contact the rider and ask if he is still on the road?
I have not received an order, and no one has contacted me to cancel.
There is take-out food all the time, and the management office will call to ask, and then they will first let people in, but the management office has never contacted me
Design is everywhere (recommended by the teacher's guide to reading for elementary and junior high school readers)
Cambridge Dual-Language Level 2 Fiction Library Fatal Memories (Level 2, Cambridge KET, 800 words or more)
The original version of Cambridge was introduced, and the international award-winning works were popular for 20 years, and the world's teenagers were synchronized to read, and the directory of national middle schools and primary schools was compiled by the teachers of national key middle schools, and the effect of listening to English and Mandarin was recorded by scanning the two-dimensional code.
[New] A Black Book of Colors for Children aged 3 to 6, with beautiful illustrations, has been selected for the New Reading Basic Directory, and is published by Bolonia.
The new version of the official version is available for invoicing, and the group purchase has a discount.
Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
【Children's reading series】Design everywhere (included in the "Reading guide for middle school students and primary school students") Ze Xuanyuan Book
A black book about colors, with 3 to 6-year-old children's illustrations, won the award of Bologna Children's Book Fair, and was selected into the new reading basic directory, and was published by Reclaiming Press.
[Can be billed] The real-life story of Denis Villeneuve's great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great translator, the great
The original, real-time witness of the century, the great translator Danika Seleskovic, the literature of the literature, the literature of the literature, the translation of the same voice, the language translator, the reference book of the research publisher.
【Original book】【Reading series for elementary and middle schools】Design is everywhere (included in the "Reading guide for elementary and middle school students") 【Can be invoiced】
There is #PRS_ORG proof, no one will take it, #PRS_ORG wronged me and made me self-defeating
I reiterate that I am a delivery person.
After they finished, no one came to deliver the food to me, and then they blamed me for taking the food myself.
I demand that you cancel immediately or I will report you
Time-lapse photography has not yet been released in stores.
Member evaluation
[Effect] Photo effect: I took two sets of clothes in total. The overall effect is good. I like this set of pictures very much.
[Service] Service details: Because pregnancy can be a bit uncomfortable during make-up, the make-up artist and staff were very considerate and allowed me to rest for a while and even gave me hot water to drink.
The price of the set: 1000 yuan
Thank you for the review. Originally, I said that it was not suitable for the ancient style. I didn't expect the finished product to be so beautiful.
Thank you for your approval, your satisfaction will make us full of electricity and continue to move forward, we will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is really great! I strongly recommend all of my friends to come here!
No matter from reception, makeup, clothing, lighting, photography to post-production, everything is flawless.
The makeup artist is very delicate, and will match your style to create a suitable makeup for you. The makeup products they use are all first-line brands.
Teacher Tian Liang is no doubt a professional photographer.
The whole studio has an artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats playing around.
We were working in Beijing, and the good cinemas in Beijing needed to be booked in advance for six months, and my colleagues who had worked in Beijing had seen the film and said it was just so-so.
He specifically sought out this studio, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expressions are not very good, and this is also the shortcoming of most people. Photographer Liangge will capture the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup artists, photographers, post-production, a tight-knit team.
When we came out, everyone applauded.
I have already recommended my girlfriend to watch it, and my girlfriend is also full of joy after watching the film.
I hope that such a studio will not be buried, and more people will find their own style, instead of following the crowd.
We are very grateful for the five-star reviews from Zhenting and Jingling, both of whom are very thoughtful and creative new people. We are a creative studio, and as long as customers like us, we will do our best to complete 100% of the work. We are very grateful for the acquaintance and meeting.
The sweet and kind assistant, the lively and cheerful photography teacher, everyone in the team is super nice, beautiful and wonderful, and it is a very memorable experience, and the effect is better than I expected. Everyone worked hard, and I am very grateful to everyone. 😘😘
Thank you for your review. It is also a kind of fate to know you. From Hohhot to Qinhuangdao, the trust we have built is like a journey of thousands of miles. I am very happy to meet you. I hope to come to Qinhuangdao again next time.
How do I give money?
The food has already been delivered.
No rider received
Now the restaurant staff are calling me.
A programming noob who wants to share his personal experience.
If you are planning to enter this industry, you can choose to find a place to train, but if you don't have this idea, it is better to learn on your own, because the cost of training is very high, and it will take six months to learn.
But if you are planning to enter this industry, training is a very good choice, especially for those with low self-confidence and weak self-discipline.
If you are more self-disciplined, you can choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, choosing a good training institution is very important.
First, we need to look at the strength of the institution's teachers. If the strength of the teachers is not strong enough, then the training institution has no meaning. Of course, some newly opened training institutions do not have very strong teachers.
Secondly, it is best to inquire about this training institution before choosing it, and it is best to inquire about the students who have graduated from this institution. After all, only the students of this institution know how this institution is, and the courses taught are good or bad.
Hello, I don't know how to answer your question because I haven't introduced my own situation, and the relationship between learning this thing and one's own situation is very big.
For example, professional, age, the language you want to learn, even in which city, these will have something to do with the industry you want to work in.
If you are a student and have not graduated or have graduated in computer science, I would personally recommend self-study. This is the most efficient and cost-effective way, and many of the offline and online training institutions are very good now, but the learning cost is high, and the investment of time is relatively large. It is basically necessary to concentrate on training for 3-6 months.
However, if I were to say these things, it would be very convenient to self-study. Nowadays, many learning resources on the Internet are free, or there are many training resources on B station. If you can't find resources, you can contact me and I will provide you with free resources or detailed consultation.
In addition, there are some more classic books that can be combined with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but are willing to invest some money and time in learning, then it is recommended that you go to a training institution to learn. The teachers explain things in great detail and are available to answer any questions. In addition, there is help available in planning and supervising your learning.
And now many training institutions will sign employment agreements, with internship positions, and after learning, they will recommend to go to the company, so that the job interview process can save a lot of things.
That's my opinion, and because I don't know your situation, I can only give you a brief introduction. If you have any other questions, you can contact me for further communication.
I saw it on the app before 1 p.m.
What is it called?
I haven't finished yet, what are you doing?
We accept various (installation, cleaning, maintenance), wall-mounted water heaters, water purifiers, washing machines, air conditioners, toilets, stoves, smoke machines, light fixtures, professional beautification, housekeeping services
Thank you to those who have liked me silently, for working hard to live, life is very hard but I have to continue
Life will not disappoint those who work hard, and I like to pay attention to those who like me. Thank you to those who silently like me.
Life is like this, others only see the results, but we alone carry the process, facing life, we can only be strong and continue, there is no choice, we can only look back but cannot go back...
Cleaning is work, and it is a responsibility, and life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of heart.
Though we do the dirtiest job, we do it with the most serious attitude and clean every corner of the customer's house, seeing the customer's satisfied smiles and thumbs up, all the hard work is worth it!
My daily work
- Your request, my service.
With heart service, with heart cleaning, keep the beauty.
The details you took care of made it possible for me to "purify" myself, and serve the love of the family.
Bao Wen is clean, and the trees are well-groomed. The service is good, and the house is clean.
Housekeeping inside and outside, my daily work
Although the crystal lamp is beautiful, it will become dull and dark if it is not cleaned for a long time, and only after cleaning can it shine brightly. Life is also like this
To do things with heart is to succeed, to shape things with detail is to create exquisiteness, and we are serious about making beautiful seams.
I will give you the opportunity to be satisfied, and quality speaks for itself, because professionalism is worth being trusted, and your recognition is my encouragement!
It's not a good time to be in any line of work!
But I always believe that as long as you have a good attitude, stick to it, and work hard, you will be better than others, at least you will be better than complaining."
A day begins with the dawn, and all good things begin in the morning. May you start the day with happiness, luck, health, and good fortune. Start a new day with a good mood. Good morning.
As a child, happiness was something to be had; as a grown-up, happiness is a goal to be achieved; and as an adult, happiness is a state of mind that can be understood.
Do the most real and kindest self, walk according to one's heart, and there will be no regrets in this life; there is only one road in life, and one's own road; there are two treasures in life: a healthy body and a good mood, and a bright and beautiful life until old age!
Every stage of life will bring different challenges.
Often, what holds you back is not your ability, but your courage to face it.
Since it is impossible to avoid it, it is better to face it.
The harder you try, the harder you get knocked down; the sooner you face the challenge, the easier it will be to overcome.
The 1st Contemporary Art Biennale in Saudi Arabia - Xinhua News Agency
Liyadh, Saudi Arabia, December 12 (Xinhua) -- The first Saudi Arabia Contemporary Art Biennial - Diriya Contemporary Art Biennial opened to the public on Nov. 11 in the Diriya JAX art district located in the northwest of Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. A total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China and other countries participated in the exhibition.
The two-year exhibition was co-organized by the Shanghai Biennale Foundation and the Ullens Center for Contemporary Art (UCCA) in Urumqi, and the director of UCCA Urumqi, Tian Feiyue, served as the artistic director.
According to the exhibition team, the theme of the two-year exhibition is "Crossing the River by Touching the Stone", which refers to the reform strategies taken during the period of social and economic transformation, and also reflects the current situation of Saudi society and culture.
The exhibition covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters, and the exhibition hall spans six interconnected buildings, presenting six units: "Crossing the River by Touching the Stone", "Inheritance as an Experiment", "Marginal Thinking", "Towards the Public", "Beautiful New World", and "The Spirit of Art".
Among them, the number of works by 27 Saudi artists accounts for more than 40% of the total number of works in the exhibition, including paintings, installations and performances, etc. 12 Chinese artists have also received attention. Some artists use recycled materials in a novel way to create their works, such as Xu Bing in his series of "Stories from the Mountains" (2014), which reconstructs a classic landscape painting using discarded objects.
The chief executive officer of the Diriyah Season Foundation, Barclay, said that he hoped that this year's season would establish an international dialogue and give global audiences an opportunity to learn about the cultural and creative industries and creative community of Saudi Arabia, and strengthen exchanges and interactions.
Tai Feiyu said, " The goal of the biennial is to participate in the global dialogue of contemporary art, and to allow the audience of Saudi Arabia to integrate into the world of contemporary art. "
It is understood that a series of lectures will be held during the opening week of the double year, and artists, curators and leaders of the creative industry will discuss cross-cultural exchange, development of contemporary art and other topics.
I ordered a hatchet
The restaurant said the rider couldn't deliver the bones
Want to know the reason clearly
Bones can be used to call a restaurant for delivery
However, the system is not very convenient, and it is necessary to use another room.
I'm at #ADDRESS#, the store in Medellin, Colombia.
I'm very far from that place
Business English Conversation 100+ + Business English Dictionary (with multiple learning gifts)
In just 10 minutes a day, you can easily open your mouth!
The common business scenarios are covered, and the commonly used business English expressions are all included, and the business English communication skills are all explained!
Free download the oral simulation practice + foreign teacher reading audio + free download the universal business common sense, easy to improve business English speaking skills!
Practical Business English Conversation 100, written by Wang Hui Li, Zhang Lili, and Wang Yuchui, published by China Aerospace Publishing House, can be purchased legally with an electronic invoice, and customers can contact the online customer service at any time if they have any questions.
Five minutes before bedtime, those classic works of literature that have been passed down for hundreds of years, Yang Chunli, Cheng Yueshui, and Song Bing. Translated by 9787512415812, Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press.
The original book, electronic invoice, after-sales service, any questions can be consulted online customer service.
The woman who wears handmade shoes, Adrianna Cuevas, Dong Yanshan, Chen Huijie translated, 9787513306645, xin xing chubanshe【直发】
The original book, published by the publisher, issued a regular electronic invoice, and you can contact the online customer service at any time if you have any problems!
Beauty is in the eye of the beholder.
Full reduction in the store, full reduction in the amount, the benefits are many, welcome to buy!
【文轩正版】实用商务英语口语情景100
Xinhua Wenxuan is delivering the original books (in Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, and Tianjin) to the four corners of the country, and 75% of the cities can be delivered the next day!
Together we talk about autism and the 55 closely related questions (plus) Brigitta K. Brigitta K. Brown【正版】【正版书】
Beautiful English, those suffocatingly beautiful letters (letter volumes) (800 pieces of expansion knowledge, 1000 pieces of authoritative English, 2000 pieces of classic quotes, 3【Original book】【Original book】
Yunnan: Coordinated to standardize the management of rural public service positions - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Kunming, December 12 (Reporter Lin Bifeng) On the 12th, Xinhua News Agency reported that in order to continue to do a good job in the employment and livelihood assistance of the people who have been lifted out of poverty, to consolidate and expand the achievements of poverty alleviation, Yunnan Province has recently issued relevant policies to promote the management of rural public service jobs, which will help to promote the comprehensive promotion of rural revitalization.
The relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Department of Labor and Social Affairs introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public service jobs, which are used to provide employment for rural disadvantaged groups such as poverty alleviation labor, and play an important role in helping the poor achieve employment increase, consolidate the achievements of poverty alleviation, and effectively improve the capacity of rural public services.
The new regulation was jointly issued by seven departments, including the Department of Human Resources and Social Security, the Department of Rural Revitalization, the Department of Finance, and so on. It mainly unifies the scope of recruitment of rural public service personnel, fund management, post development, post management, and so on.
In terms of job development, the new regulations are clear, and the principle of “setting according to demand, using according to assignment, managing in a dynamic way, and controlling the total amount” “who develops, who uses, and who is responsible” and “one person for one job, self-disclosure, and unified management” should be followed.
The recruitment process must follow the announcement, application, review, public announcement, hiring, pre-employment training and placement arrangements.
In addition, the new regulations clearly defined the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public service positions, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public service positions, and required the development departments of rural public service positions to purchase accident insurance for rural public service positions.
The address was wrong
Hello
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Has it been cancelled?
Second, although the rightists had a brief period of glory in history, it was short-lived, so it was short because it was given a little sunshine and a little boiled water, and sweat came out when it was hit.
However, in the process of social progress, the right-wing has played an active role.
From the end of the Cultural Revolution, the right-wing should not deny the positive significance of developing the economy, improving science and technology, and institutionalizing and guaranteeing human rights.
Three, although I do not completely agree with some of Li Weidong's views, I am very concerned about his views, and I also respect Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he is serious about the social problems of China.
But I oppose his anti-communist theory, I think that the revolution is necessary, and the revolution will inevitably lead to social turmoil, and the people's livelihood will be damaged, and the political groups will be mixed with sand and mud, and the foreign forces will take advantage of the opportunity.
Fourth, to change or improve China, one must have a patient attitude and a responsible attitude towards the country and the people, and not be a right-wing opportunist who seeks to profit from the fire. That is not a rightist, but a scoundrel.
Let's talk about left again.
On the left, it is a bunch of the era and politics' orphans.
If the right has a positive meaning for society, the Communist Party will listen to some right-wing opinions and analyze their ideas when it needs to, but the left has none of this, because the left wants to get rid of all the rubbish that the Communist Party has thrown away!
Five, I recently saw some friends arguing back and forth with the rebels, which was quite lively, and I felt that it was not necessary.
Don't try to reason with the Chinese traitors or the leftists. They are all the same, and there is no reason to reason with them.
Don't try to prove that we are right, and don't want to let the traitors and leftists admit that they are wrong, why?
I told my friends, "When the traitors curse you, when the leftists curse you, it proves that our middle path is correct!"
Many people have dreams when they are young, but as they grow older, they forget their dreams, or pursue their dreams, but become eccentric.
And as the dream fades, so does the dragon.
I think left-right generally refers to constraints and freedom, and China should be more left-leaning due to its historical and cultural innate genes.
Domestic right-wing freedom is focused on efficiency and development, and left-wing supervision is more focused on fairness and safety.
At present, society as a whole hopes to pay more attention to fairness, while the US-China competition is inevitable, and the left is undoubtedly positive. It is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Although I don't understand it, I'll just like it.
What can I say, flowers are just like that
In recent years, the United States has locked and blocked Huawei's chips, which has not only put Huawei into an unprecedented predicament, but also caused "American" enterprises to suffer huge losses.
The United States has pressured the Chinese chip industry, requiring domestic enterprises and allies to simultaneously lock down the chip industry in China, which directly led to the impact on the orders and profits of global chip suppliers, resulting in the reduction of research and development investment and the decline of production capacity of chip production enterprises, thus causing the shortage of the global chip supply chain.
Now, "missing core" has spread to all major industries in the world, such as car production, mobile phone price increase, and almost every industry that uses chips has been affected.
In order to master the “chip” self-reliance, more and more technology giants in more and more countries have begun to go down the road of “de-Americanization”.
In order to firmly control the global semiconductor control, to restrain the development of China's semiconductor industry, recently, the United States has acted frequently. It is hosting the "Chip Summit" and inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish a semiconductor alliance, and is also inviting 64 countries to establish
When most people thought Intel's move would cause some impact on Taiwan Semiconductor, and it was likely to steal Taiwan Semiconductor's "bowl".
This is because Intel, as a veteran technology giant in the United States, has been deeply engaged in the semiconductor field for decades, and has a large number of talent teams and technological reserves. It must rise quickly in the short term and defeat Taiwan Semiconductor.
However, Zhang Zhongmou, the founder of Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC), did not care much about Intel's decision.
At the "2021 Master Wisdom Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou's words were shocking. For Intel's investment in the construction of a semiconductor plant, Zhang Zhongmou said bluntly: Intel is building a chip foundry, which is quite ironic.
Zhang Zhongmou's grudge against Intel's entry into the semiconductor industry is because Zhang Zhongmou still has a grudge against Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) and Intel from 30 years ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was the jewel in the crown of the American manufacturing industry, occupying the top position in the world, and was the hegemon of the world's semiconductor industry.
By the 1980s, the world's top-tier semiconductor chips had been monopolized by a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by IDM (Integrated Device Manufacturing), and the chip was designed, manufactured, and packaged by a single factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, this model has made some small businesses suffer, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs can only sigh that they can't afford to build a large-scale production line.
After entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to see the phenomenon of cooperation in the division of labor, and in 1984, Zhang Zhongmou heard that there was a company that specialized in chip design, and he thought that since there was a company that specialized in design, then it would be possible to establish a factory for the manufacture of wafers.
Not long after, Zhang Zhongmou's idea became a reality, and Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) was born.
Taiwan Semiconductor has focused its main business on “chip manufacturing” and does not design its own chips, but only provides contract manufacturing services for the manufacture of chips.
When Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) was founded, it was just a small fish in front of the giant Intel.
In order to obtain capital support, Zhang Zhongmou once approached Intel for investment, but when Intel heard that Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) was only engaged in the manufacturing process of the chip industry, it obviously had a high self-esteem and looked down on TSMC and refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also recognized that Intel was not paying attention to the service of wafer fabrication at that time.
I didn't expect that the giant in the wafer manufacturing industry, which I looked down on last year, would also start to do wafer subcontracting this year.
So Zhang Zhongmou felt that Intel's entry into wafer fabrication was ironic.
Today, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) is valued higher than Intel.
Intel is also not afraid to face the strong offensive of Taiwan Semiconductor.
Today, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) is racing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm from 7 years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
It's over
Placed the order 2 hours ago at 19:06.
Today, we'll look at some of the "strange hot searches."
What is normal sentiment?
Randomly select three hot searches: February 2nd Dragon Rise, Good Luck Friend Price Increase, and the event of Huo La La, and the public opinion spreads to form a peak, and then [index decline] (smooth curve) finally dissipates, and if there is a secondary public opinion, there will be a small peak again.
They look exactly the same as the "network sentiment evolution model" shown on the website of the Cyberspace Administration of China.
What is abnormal public opinion?
Randomly selecting six hot searches in the same event, presenting the shape of a "peak", a "sawtooth" and a "cliff".
The first type, the "peak" type, refers to the artificial heating and rapid rise to the top of the hot search; the second type, the "sawtooth" type, refers to the periodic heating to ensure that the topic remains in the hot search list; the third type, the "cliff" type, refers to the collective withdrawal from the hot search, and the hot search has played its "function" and has received a new task and is heading for a new battlefield.
As shown in Figure 9, the peak of one event is exactly the trough of another, and the time difference is negligible, so it must be that the forces received a task and launched a new offensive.
The professionalism of black PR is evident: dozens of hot searches are listed at the same time, and which ones attract attention, which ones are responsible for popularization, which ones are used to stir up controversy, which ones divert attention, which ones affect cognition, which ones mislead judgment, which ones incite emotions, and which ones bind decision-making. The black-owned accounts are fought in batches and nodes, and all the elements of public opinion propagation and diffusion are considered.
The spread is a science, and without the subjective factors of position, emotion, etc., even the black public relations will not be able to escape.
Wherever you go, you will leave a trace. Such a trace, we will dig it out together.
Data source: heat search time machine.
First cases of omicron variant infection found in countries such as Mauritius - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 12 (Xinhua) - The first cases of infection with the new mutant virus of the novel coronavirus were reported in Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi in recent days.
On the 10th, Mauritius reported the country's two cases of Omikron virus infection.
According to the Minister of Health of the Republic of Mozambique, Kaelish Jagutpal, one of the patients was a tourist who arrived in Maputo from South Africa on November 27, and the other was a local resident who was tested positive for COVID-19 on November 30 after being in contact with a person who had recently visited South Africa.
After being isolated and treated in the hospital, the two patients' nucleic acid test results were all negative, and they have returned to their respective residences.
Cyprus's Ministry of Health announced on the 10th that it had confirmed three cases of infection with the Omicron variant in the country for the first time.
The three are students who returned from a trip abroad in the first few days of this month and were not admitted to the hospital due to mild symptoms.
In order to prevent the spread of the mutant strain of the virus, the government has continued to increase its prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10, all passengers aged 12 and above who enter by plane must pay for and undergo nucleic acid testing at the airport.
The Ministry of Health also announced on the 10th that it would begin to vaccinate children aged 5 to 11 in the country with the Pfizer vaccine.
Malawi's health minister, Khumbize Chiponda, said on the 9th that the country had found 3 cases of Omikron virus infection for the first time.
The country's health department conducted genome sequencing on 12 positive samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found the three cases of infection.
Takeaway never delivered
The rider's phone numbers were all fake
I have already re-ordered
Will the refund be made for the previous single?
If not, please cancel the order and refund.
I was thinking of eating breakfast earlier so that I could eat earlier, but now it's already 7 p.m. and I haven't eaten anything yet.
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese translation or preference English?
That was sent to
Do you want to call and talk to him?
Dear customers,
Thank you for choosing to dine at Zhiyun Restaurant. We are delighted to provide you and your family with more delicious and convenient dishes, and better service. Your satisfaction and praise are our driving force.
Thank you for your five-star rating, I love you!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Cloud Restaurant. We are very sorry for the inconvenience caused.
At the same time, we would like to thank you for your real experience evaluation, and we will find the shortcomings in time and take effective measures to improve them. We will strictly control the quality and quantity of the dishes, and our phone number is 18912251735. We look forward to seeing you again.
Dear customers, thank you for choosing to dine at Zhiyun Restaurant. We are sorry that the food problem has caused you an unpleasant dining experience. We have communicated with the kitchen and strictly controlled the food. We appreciate your understanding and support. I am the little cloud of Zhiyun Restaurant. I look forward to seeing you again!
Come to the party and leave a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Little Cloud". When our carefully cooked dishes are well received by you, it is the happiest moment for us!
I look forward to meeting you again.
Dear beloved master, first of all, thank you for your recognition and evaluation. We will try our best to do better!
Secondly, I would like to thank you for your support and praise in the busy time, and wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think this is any help!
It was money in the stomach
The order is a claw
Okay, phone is #PHONENUMBER#.
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I #NAME# called your staff to explain
Your rider told me the address was too far
360 Home Furnishings
Address: No. 156, No. 12th Floor, Happy Garden, South Ring Road
At first, it was a friend's introduction because of trust, so I chose to take a look at the initial budget of 70,000 to do a basic renovation.
As soon as you enter the store, a series of scams begin.
I went to the store just to show them my floor plan. They didn't go to the site to measure the house, and they quoted me $70,000 for my $135,000 house. I didn't know what brand of materials they were using.
Their second scam is that as soon as you enter the store, they will drag you away and take your deposit (which you will never be able to get back, unless you have enough experience and knowledge to outwit them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called manager to tell me that if I paid the deposit today, I could get a certain discount.
This is just one big pitfall, and I'm living proof of it. I dropped $10,000 in one fell swoop when my head was in a spin.
He gave me a quote with many problems: 70,000 not including water and electricity renovation, not including any doors and cabinets, and these three are the head of the cost of the basic installation.
They charge more for their service points than other companies.
I lost trust in this company, and I signed a contract without being told anything.
When I went to get my money back, they were very professional and had a dedicated team to deal with you.
No matter what, it's the customer's problem, and they're completely at fault.
There are so many excuses, and so many details, I don't want to go into them all, but in short, don't choose them, because my friend's house that they renovated is of poor quality, and they will charge you for all sorts of fees in the future.
They are just the original fake dragons that were used to deceive people, and now they have been changed into a big beauty, as if they have closed down and changed into something else.
So, everyone should not choose such a despicable decoration company.
In the future, everyone should look up some information on the Internet when they choose. Because the renovation is not a small amount of money.
To ask a question to the merchant, please first log in or register
No posting of any kind of business reviews, please see the merchant inclusion declaration for details.
We provide you with the latest information on the address, telephone number, business hours and other information of the merchants in the decoration design channel of Meituan Dianping, and find the decoration company to decorate the decoration company.
Please cancel the order within 30 minutes if it is not delivered in less than 30 minutes.
Is there no other way? Like, changing the address?
Okay, then you don't cancel this conversation, if I don't get my money back within 5 to 10 days, I will pursue it.
I asked if it was possible to cancel in 15 minutes or so.
The chicken was cooked, but I received raw meat, so I couldn't eat it.
The sky is full of stars丨The Great Pleiades Meteor Shower will peak on the 14th - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) As the last major meteor shower of the year, the Geminid meteor shower in the Northern Hemisphere will reach its peak on December 14. Meteor enthusiasts can observe the shower after midnight on that day.
Beijing amateur astronomer Anju captured the Gemini meteor shower in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most of the parent bodies of the meteor showers are periodic comets, but the parent body of the Gemini meteor shower is 3200 Phaethon, which is an Apollo-type asteroid.
The Gemini meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower not to be produced by a comet.
The president of the Tianjin Astronomical Society, Mr. Xiu Lipeng, said that like the New Year’s blockbuster, the Geminid meteor shower usually appears at the end of the year, and the “showing schedule” can last from December 4th to 17th.
This meteor shower is known for its large number and stability, along with the Geminid meteor shower and the Orionid meteor shower, it is known as one of the three major meteor showers in the Northern Hemisphere.
One of the distinctive features of the meteor shower in Gemini is that the meteor bodies move slowly, the colors are rich, and there are many fireballs. It is suitable for amateur astronomers and photographers to take pictures.
Yang Jing, a stargazer in Tianjin, took a picture of the Gemini meteor shower on December 13, 2020.
The December 14th 15:00 GMT peak of the Geminid meteor shower is expected to have a ZHR (the number of meteors visible per hour, under ideal viewing conditions, when the radiant is overhead) of 150.
The Gemini meteor shower chart.
"Last year, the twin-peaked shower of shooting stars left a deep impression on people, but this year's twin-peaked shower of shooting stars will be affected by the moon, and the quality will be slightly reduced.
On the 14th, the 11th of the lunar month, the moon is in the full moon phase, and the bright moonlight will interfere with the observation. However, after midnight, the moon will fall down, and the radiation point of the Gemini meteor shower will also rise higher.
Friends who like the meteor shower can observe it in this few hours after the moon sets, but they should pay attention to keep warm and keep warm. "
How can we observe more meteors?
"Observing in the city is not recommended, and you can choose a place in the countryside or a rural area with a high altitude, a small light pollution, and a wide view to the northeast, and then patiently wait for the moon to fall, and then observe it visually.
It is worth noting that the flow of the double-star meteor shower is very large in all directions, and it is not necessary to keep staring at the radiation point of the double-star meteor shower.
Friends who like photography should choose a wide-angle lens with a large aperture, and use a high ISO and a large aperture when shooting.
Based on the consideration of stability and continuity, the tripod, the backup battery and the shutter line are also indispensable. ”
"It is reminded by Xiu Li Peng.
What is the difference between laser TV and traditional TV in market positioning?
According to my understanding, the traditional television referred to by the author should be the liquid crystal television, and the difference in market positioning between the laser television and the liquid crystal television is mainly as follows:
First, laser television is more focused on the large screen market.
Compared with the market positioning of liquid crystal television, the laser television is obviously more focused on the large screen market, or the laser television itself is a product born for the large screen.
Currently, the mainstream size of liquid crystal televisions is between 55 inches and 65 inches, and the size of laser televisions is generally above 75 inches, and the largest is more than 100 inches, which fully meets the needs of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the proportion of global shipments and sales of laser TVs has been continuously increasing, and the proportion has exceeded 60% in the overall TV sales volume of more than 80 inches.
According to the prediction of Zhongyi Kang, the sales volume of laser TV in 2020 will grow by more than 140%, and it will continue to maintain a high growth rate.
The success of the big screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of the laser television in eye protection.
Based on the principle of laser television reflection, the light emitted by the laser source does not directly enter the eyeball, and the imaging process is closer to the natural conditions of the object, and the stimulation to the eye is smaller than that of the backlight source of the liquid crystal television.
The China Electronics Standardization Institute's Seis Laboratory and Beijing Eye Hospital's ophthalmologists conducted a strict comparison experiment under the same conditions, and obtained 144 sets of test data.
The data proves that the laser television has very strong eye protection characteristics, and even has certain improvement effects in certain aspects.
In the current attention paid to eye health, the laser TV not only attracted more and more users with the advantage of eye protection, but also opened up another breakthrough in the color TV market.
Second, laser TV focuses on the high-end market.
In contrast to the downward trend in the price of liquid crystal televisions, the current market price of laser televisions is mostly in the tens of thousands of yuan, and the price gradually rises as the size and light source are upgraded.
Why is laser TV so expensive?
It is a reasonable thing to do.
With the continuous development of light sources and technology, laser TVs have many advantages that cannot be achieved by liquid crystal TVs and projectors.
With the ultra-short-throw projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is shorter than that of the traditional projection device, and it can achieve the 100-inch large screen experience in a short distance, and the required space is small, and the host is small and occupies a small space.
In terms of brightness, the high-end brand laser TV can reach more than 2000 lumens.
In addition, the lower the temperature, the smaller the loss of the equipment, and the longer the life of the television.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with true 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, artificial intelligence systems, and biomimetic screens, which can provide users with a more immersive visual and auditory experience.
Talking about fake demand, it is the product of demand segmentation, and in terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, the laser TV is not a dish for audio-visual players, and it can be tried if you want to balance the big screen and the viewing environment. Everything has advantages and disadvantages, and after weighing the pros and cons, you can judge yourself. I am afraid that I will be deceived by one-sided words.
Simply put, the ultra-wide-angle close-up projection machine - the laser TV - has to use expensive ultra-wide-angle lenses and reflectors to get close to the screen, which does not conform to the best optical design.
To shield some of the ambient light, a micro-structured Fresnel screen is used, which is expensive, and the 80-inch price is about the same as a 65-inch LCD.
There is one more thing I particularly dislike, and that is the fact that the manufacturers of the projectors are using the mirror reflection on the screen as a selling point, please, the light on the screen that the eyes can see is the direct light, when you reflect the light on the ceiling, the eyes can't see it, why do you have to make the LCD TV also reflect the light, when you open the TV ceiling, isn't the ceiling also lit up?
And, if the projection screen is not a mirror, it can't become an image.
The hot spot effect of the high gain screen (light spot) was ignored, and a lot of light was reflected to the eyes at a certain angle, which was really uncomfortable.
The visual aesthetic photography store has not yet opened a branch
After adding the WeChat appointment date, the little sister arranged the time for me to choose, and the reply was very timely~
Before going, I had a look at the store's photos, which were mostly outdoor wedding photos, and they were very beautiful. There were many styles of photography involved.
After the day was over, I simply communicated with the little sister and she patiently tried on two styles of clothes that I was indecisive about. In the end, I decided to start makeup and styling. The photographer would set up some props before the shoot, guide the action, and pay attention to every detail.
But maybe because I didn't share my specific shooting ideas with him, the result was not what I wanted, but it should be pretty good.
After the photo is taken, the photographer will help to choose the photos, exchange the post-production style, and feel that it is very careful.
The repaired film will take about half a month to wait for the effect~
The second time to win the photo banquet activity - most of the clothes can choose one to be photographed.
She finally chose a black gauze skirt to experience different styles.
The whole shooting process takes about two hours, and the makeup and shooting are responsible for the photographer who is 95 years old. I feel a little shy. I hope that in the future, I can give more suggestions on the customer's shooting action guidance. It is quite talkative. The shooting process is quite enjoyable.
Visual Aesthetic Photography Gallery Preferred Quality Shop Reply
And check out Queenie on the home page!
When I went to the store, I first filled out my name and phone number, and then I selected the clothes. I was very patient to try on several sets of clothes, and the service was very good. After I selected the clothes, I put on makeup and hair for a long time, and the service was very good. Later, they taught me how to pose, and it felt like I was posing for a photo. It took about a month to receive the photos, and they didn't look much different from the original.
【Environment】Overall, it was okay.
There are many options for clothing.
There are about three makeup positions, and there is a photography studio inside.
【Service】is very warm and attentive.
The sculptor was very patient.
The photographer will also teach you the moves very seriously.
If you are not satisfied, the photographer will also offer to do a retouch.
【Experience】Maybe the shape is a bit out of date, and the original double eyelids have been replaced with three eyelids.
The eyebrows were also shaved, which is a bit awkward for everyday life.
The photo was taken ten days ago, but the P-picture effect is not very satisfactory. I feel that the double eyelid stickers are still very obvious.
Because she was not sure what style to choose, she tried two styles and finally chose the black dress. The little girl said that this style was more classic and retro.
After choosing the clothes, I started to do makeup and hair. The hairstylist and makeup artist were very patient and did a very good job. I was very satisfied with the effect.
After I did my makeup, I started to take pictures. The photographer was with me all the time, directing me to pose. The whole process was very smooth and harmonious.
After the filming, he carefully selected four of his favorite ones and said that he was very satisfied with the 15 episodes.
No response for 3 days... since your system cannot recognize my credit card, I cannot join the #PRS_ORG# plus monthly fee plan!
The strangest thing is that I always use the same credit card when I pay.
I now have to pay for shipping every time.
Can I first waive my monthly fee, and then collect my monthly fee after you have completed your investigation, is that possible?
Are umbrella insurance worth it?
Umbrella is an insurance broker platform on the Internet.
According to the setting conditions: According to the "Regulations on the Supervision of Insurance Broker Institutions (Revised in 2015)", in order to become an insurance broker, the following three keywords must be met: the shareholders must have no major violations in the past three years, the minimum capital is RMB 500 million, and the company must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
These three points are actually very strict. In summary, it is necessary to have strength, and it must be approved by the national authority of the State Administration of Insurance (supervising the insurance companies and banks in the country) and the shareholders must have a good reputation. As a small umbrella insurance, the insured does not need to worry too much about whether the small umbrella insurance is legitimate or not, because there are these three requirements, which are not met by all insurance companies.
At this point, it's good, it's trustworthy.
From the insurance product point of view: Small umbrella insurance is an insurance supermarket, and many of the company's star critical illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the newly launched and泰超级玛丽5号重疾险, the insurer and the underwriter are both and泰寿险, and Small umbrella insurance is just a third-party intermediary, and there is no need to question its credibility.
From the payment mode perspective: Internet platform products, due to the lack of operating costs of business outlets and the cost of business employees, are generally more cost-effective, and the payment mode is flexible, supporting monthly payment, which relieves the pressure of the insured to pay premiums, and at the same time can maximize the leverage of insurance.
That's a good thing.
It can be considered.
From the perspective of professionalism: This is very important, because insurance is a very professional industry, and many Internet product customers can self-insure. This will lead to many misunderstandings, and in the health disclosure and professional fields, non-insurance professionals often add their own subjective consciousness when they self-insure, which can easily lead to many liability risks.
I have also done insurance sales over the phone myself, just like Alibaba’s “Tencent Micro Insurance” and “Umbrella Umbrella”, which are both insurance broker platforms on the Internet. I am very responsible in telling everyone.
The insurance on the Internet is true and reliable, but the people are not, the Internet channel does not have professional staff, and there are many sales misguidance.
For example, 1 yuan insurance covers 600,000, and if you buy insurance and get a mobile phone, you can get 600,000 for free. These marketing strategies are not wrong, but they are too good to be true. You only need to pay 1 yuan in the first month, and the next month you need to pay according to the normal charge, which is between 100 and 200 yuan. Many customers don't know what they are paying for.
They thought they could get one dollar, and the insurance company paid 600 million (the world fell apart).
Free mobile phones are only given to special policy numbers such as 6666 and 8888, and if you win the lottery, you will not exchange it and no one will remind you.
(This is another pit for the insured) Free of charge, they can get up to 600,000 yuan of health insurance, which is short-term. If there is no other commercial insurance, what is the use of 600,000 yuan to solve the problem, and the life starts to be naked.
The government is also cracking down on misleading sales of internet insurance.
So, in general, there are no problems with the platform, and there are no problems with the product. The problem is with the professionalism and professionalism of the salesperson.
It is suggested that the main should consider comprehensively and carefully, in fact, the products of many offline insurance brokers are more comprehensive, and there are more opportunities and products for customers to choose, and the cost performance of some products is better than that of the Internet products.
I have helped 59 internet customers to insure offline products, and saved 2000-3000 yuan/year for each customer.
If you have any questions, please feel free to communicate and exchange with me.
I am a Mingya insurance agent with three years of experience in enterprise management training, and I have served more than 1,000 enterprise users. I have cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies, and I will customize insurance products for customers according to their needs before they purchase insurance. During the purchase, I will compare three insurance companies for customers, and try my best to help customers get the best insurance results. After the purchase, I will help customers sort out the insurance policies and manage the insurance policies, so that customers can rest assured and worry-free.
Grow with each customer for life.
I hope my answer can help the questioner!
According to the definition of insurance supervision department, Internet insurance is insurance business that can complete all the procedures of insurance after clicking the insurance link.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, and the insurance advisor does not need to sign, and all steps can be completed by the policyholder himself.
Although the online insurance policy does not have much "ceremony" and may not even have a printed paper contract, this does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This model is somewhat reminiscent of the "telemarketing" style of sales, but there is a fatal flaw in buying insurance in this way, and that is that the follow-up service may not be able to keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, should we think carefully about the "intermediary" we choose? Is this the "insurance intermediary" who can accompany us for a long time and provide us with services in the future?
How can I contact the delivery person?
It's already 3 o'clock
Was that supposed to be compensation for me?
I said I wanted to knock on doors and deliver goods.
But the rider left the bike outside and people walked away
He also sent me the wrong thing.
Your rider has already taken my #NUMBER# takeaway, but it is still in the queue.
The rider received my delivery at 19:25, but still refused to leave
Do you want to order other food after I buy it?
What to do
Where did your rider go?
Wait, what?
I'm going to deliver the package.
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll report you
But my food can have safety and health issues
Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide Gold Edition [Original book, no worries about after-sales service]
【Original books, lightning delivery, no worries about quality, can issue invoices】
Classic Emblem Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword and Knife Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Book Set of 3 Volumes World Military Books Classic Military Badges and Performance Introduction Military Uniform and Sword and Knife
Nine lectures on the collection strategy of Chinese paintings【Original book, lightning delivery】
【满额立减 下单速发 可开发票 正版图书】
Western swords and swords: appreciation and collection [original book, lightning delivery]
Piano Skills Practice Guide【Original Book, Fast Delivery】
Industrial Design Handbooks Creative Implementation + Industry Guide + Performance Luo Jian, Li Weilin, Liang Jun, Qinghua University Press [Original book, lightning delivery]
China's antique auction: Porcelain English version【Original book, lightning delivery】
Nine Songs Map【Original book, lightning delivery】
The Red Chamber of the Dream of Red Mansions [Original book, lightning delivery]
Chinese Painting History【Original book, lightning delivery】
Woodblock Prints of Birds and Flowers【Original book, lightning delivery】
Realism and Chinese movies in the 1980s [Flash delivery]
China flag design 1【Original book, lightning delivery】
Grass Flower Poem Collection【Original book, lightning delivery】
Sword Art Online 02: Aincrad【正版图书 无忧售后】
Song Jianfeng - a well-known artist in the field of portrait painting【Original book, lightning delivery】
Good law and good governance - the legacy of institutional history and public service
The 20th Anniversary Edition of the “Leadership Lectures on History and Culture” features 14 renowned historians and cultural figures, including Wang Chunyu, Zhang Daxie, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, and Deng Xiaonan.
Just return the discount code
No problem, remember that there is no need to arrange for re-delivery, I have already purchased it, and I don't want to waste it
Thank you for your help
From the past to the present, I have always opposed any form of defamation and abuse, and I cannot accept this kind of personal attack.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must eliminate this kind of scoundrel.
If you don't look at the party and faction, the most difficult thing to resist is this kind of bad manners.
From the moment you sent me a friend request on Facebook, and then posted a mocking post, and then tried to publish my home address and my father's name on social media, I have taken a no-response attitude.
You continued to tag me with a frequency of six meals a day, even after I had already forgiven you. You continued to post on Facebook and with your so-called friends about my cryptic, humiliating remarks about your appearance, your body, your lifestyle, and so on. I...don't care anymore.
I was surprised to receive so many messages from my friends after I posted a picture of my face on Facebook with sexual harassment content.
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can't keep silent anymore.
After I reported the news, you didn't calm down at all, but became more and more arrogant.
I don't care what your political background is, or what your social status is, in our society, we need to respect both genders.
Yes, you can continue with the mocking, the cryptic, the humiliating, the insulting, the abusive language. You can continue to say that you are only caring and concerned for me, you can continue to believe that this is not harassment, and you can continue to deny that it is your picture or continue to post all the abusive language.
Yes, I can't and I don't have the ability to stop you.
I don't know you, I don't want to know you, and my appearance and body do not need your appraisal.
I don't think any girl would be willing to be humiliated in such a way to get a name.
A friend asked me if I was okay.
I said I would, and you wouldn't.
I think no one would be able to say that they are okay after being bullied like this.
In work, in society, in politics, or in business, it is only those who have no basic decency who will choose to hurt any one woman in this way.
I believe that justice is universal.
I have edited some of the comments for you to review
You shouldn't be able to impersonate you
I can only say that you are the enemy of civilization
Smiles all round
Vietnam People's Daily - Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attends the Third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
Two major conferences were held during the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, discussing topics around digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, digital technology enterprises and the economic recovery and development after the COVID-19 pandemic.
The Minister of Information and Communications, Mr. Nguyen Manh Hung, said that in 2021, despite the continued spread of the COVID-19 epidemic, the number and revenue of digital technology enterprises in Vietnam continued to grow, reaching nearly 10%.
In 2021, Vietnam's typical digital products have been cultivated, and major problems faced by Vietnam have been solved in a concentrated manner. Many digital products have gone out of the country, and Vietnam's digital technology ranking has improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to take on the responsibility of developing digital transformation platforms for the country, and the task of developing these digital platforms is to fulfill the mission of the country.
On the forum, leaders of various departments and state-owned enterprises are studying, developing, applying, and transferring digital technology enterprises, organizations, and individuals, and sharing the mobilization and gathering of resources of the whole society to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, promote the digital transformation of the country, and achieve breakthroughs in economic recovery after the epidemic.
Premier Fan Minzheng emphasized at the forum that digital transformation is the only way for the world and is an objective demand for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation services are universal. Therefore, it is necessary to mobilize the participation of the people.
People and enterprises are the core, main body, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies should be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Fan Minzheng stressed that the digital transformation should reflect the spirit of the nation, and should be led by internal strength, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, while external factors are important and breakthroughs.
He also believes that digital transformation should drive the development of deep and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic, economic recovery and development, and respond to changes after the epidemic, overcome the phenomenon of resource depletion, and promote green transformation and development of green energy.
The digital transformation requires the establishment of databases related to national cultural values, historical traditions, national landscapes, and people's customs, as well as the digital transformation of banking, taxation, land management and development, logistics, and other fields.
The ultimate goal of digital transformation is to make people happier and the country more prosperous and developed.
Premier Li Keqiang required that all levels of government, all levels of agencies and enterprises should increase their leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, improve their understanding of digital transformation, continue to formulate and perfect the system of digital transformation, and strengthen the management degree and promote the development of digital technology enterprises with the spirit of respect, communication, listening, positive and active.
During the forum, Prime Minister Prayut Chan-o-cha attended the 2021 “Made in Vietnam” Excellent Digital Product Award Ceremony and the “Made in Vietnam” Digital Product Launch Ceremony.
I have reported and have provided pictures, but have not received a response
What cow, no cow
It's chicken and beef.
There's no way to eat it.
You make sure it's fresh, not old?
unacceptable
They had already placed an order early in the morning.
It was said to have been delivered at around 7 p.m.
Why remake it?
It's ridiculous
The 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Industry Talent Summit - Rolling News - Hunan Daily - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2021 (Full media reporter Zhou Zhiheng) On the 9th, the 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Committee and the Secretary of the Provincial Committee of Organization Department, attended the launch ceremony and delivered a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that holding the talent summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Provincial Party Congress. It shows that Hunan attaches great importance to talent, is eager for talent, and makes good use of talent.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving and respecting talents, a broad platform for supporting the development of talents, and a good environment for realizing a happy life. In recent years, it has implemented the talent-led development strategy in depth, and built a talent work pattern of attracting, cultivating, and retaining talents, which has become the land of talent growth, the land of innovation and entrepreneurship, and the land of living and working.
At present, Hunan is fully implementing the strategic positioning and mission tasks of “Three Highs and Four New”, and will further open the door of talent introduction and talent cultivation, and issue more preferential policies, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions for the innovation and entrepreneurship of talents. We look forward to the excellent talents from all walks of life to join hands in the high-quality development of Hunan.
The exhibition site set up Changsha, Zhuzhou, Xiangtan exhibition halls and Hunan self-trade experimental zone exhibition halls, and the provincial science and technology department, the provincial labor and social security department, and the provincial science and technology department released the advanced manufacturing industry technology demand list, the intelligent manufacturing industry talent demand directory, and the doctoral flow station intelligent manufacturing industry youth talent demand directory.
48 large enterprises such as China CNR Corporation, China Light and Power, and Yunda Technology gathered talents on the spot, and more than a thousand relevant professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project docking.
Hello
Just placed an order, and the rider was waiting at the restaurant, but the restaurant said the order was ready and there was no sign of the rider
Can you help me follow up, because I'm in a hurry, thank you
It is possible to be late by half an hour without reason
In fact, do you have a solution?
The editor brings you the best of what is on offer at Eight-Li-Han.
1) 【酒厂直营】宁城八里罕老窖 42度500ML浓香型高粱原浆白酒 口感绵柔老酒 整箱四瓶
Recommended reason: The raw materials are selected from high-quality sorghum, and the traditional process is used to brew the white liquor from Inner Mongolia Plateau. The taste is more classic, and the concentrated and sweet mouthfeel, with a bit of sweetness, is rich in layers, and the traditional solid-state fermentation white liquor process is used to retain the original flavor and aroma of the liquor, so that the liquor has a rich and thick taste.
This level 1, capacity 500, stored in a cool, dry, ventilated place, packaged other, alcohol content 42, fragrance strong, province Inner Mongolia, product weight (kg) 2.9, currently has 4 reviews with a 100% positive rating.
2. Ningcheng Bailiang old cellar big pot white wine 52 degrees of the old cellar food white wine [10 jin storage]
Recommended reason: After years of aging, it has become more concentrated and more transparent, which is loved by the Inner Mongolian pastoral nomads for its strong aroma. The concentrated style has inherited the traditional brewing technology, and it is suitable for various banquets or home use.
The capacity is 5000ml, the packaging is in a box, the product weight (kg) is 8, the fragrance is strong, the storage method is ventilated, the province is Inner Mongolia, the grade is first level, the alcohol content is 52, and there are more than 50+ reviews with a 95% positive rating.
3, 【酒厂直营】宁城八里罕老窖 42度500ML浓香型高粱原浆白酒 口感绵柔老酒 整箱六瓶
Recommendation: This white wine is made from eco-friendly sorghum, with a harmonious aroma, fermented in the cellar, and aged in the wine, resulting in a more fragrant taste.
The white liquor from the Inner Mongolia Plateau has a more classic taste, and the fragrance is so rich that it glides over the guests' lips and makes them enjoy every sip.
Recommended reason: Selected high-quality sorghum, processed by unique craftsmanship, so that you can drink freely when you entertain and gather, and when you drink at home with your family.
The high-speed train is actually a home
Address: No. 555, North First Road, Beijing View Map
There are a lot of home appliances here, many brands, and all the well-known brands.
On the 12th of December, he went to the "Houston" water purifier store to see the water purifier, and there was an activity in the store, and the price was cheaper.
There are a total of 11 floors in the house, with the basement to the 9th floor being used for parking, and parking is free during the day!
The surroundings are not good, and there are few hardware stores in the restaurant, and the taste of the restaurant is average.
This elevator is also very useless, just like the big disease, going up and down from -2 to -1, back and forth, never stopping me from pressing this floor, from the safety channel to the first floor, it is also very useless, directly to a furniture store, the furniture store is closed, and there is no way to get out of the safety channel!
It is surprising that the home is still in need of improvement, and there are many places that have not been developed.
Address: 555 N. 1st W. Salt Lake City, UT 84101, convenient transportation, large parking lot, free during the day.
Environment: To be honest, the store is big and has 8-9 floors. If you want to buy furniture, home appliances, various small things, etc., you can buy them here. Many well-known merchants have entered the store, such as M&S, OPI, H&M, Boss, Peak Creation Home, Hansteen, Jack, Union, Silk River, Fupinjiu, Wanjia Le, Nature, Zhonglian, Midea, Yadan, etc. There are so many brands, and I can only remember a few of them. It is a good place to buy products. If you are tired, you can sit on the sofa and rest.
Recently, I wanted to buy a set of comfortable sofas, and my friends said that there are many sofas to choose from here, and I looked at Gujia Home and Meikem. I felt that it was okay, but the price was a little expensive, so I was still hesitating.
Baidu Dianping provides you with the latest information on the address, phone number, business hours and other information of the merchants, and helps you find a decoration company.
Already given to my guests, #PRS_ORG# can't be completed
That's it, that's it
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it will not be cancelled.
The Yangtze River mainstream realizes the full coverage of the green comprehensive service area - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Wuhan, December 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) On December 10, the Fuling Water Green Comprehensive Service Area in Chongqing was completed and put into operation, which is the second water green comprehensive service area in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Fuling Water Green Comprehensive Service Area in Sichuan Province was put into operation on December 8.
At this point, the green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
Mr. Qiu Jianhua, deputy director of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, introduced that before, 10 green comprehensive service areas have been built and put into operation in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River in provinces such as Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui and Jiangsu, which have been recognized by the majority of sailors and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River navigation.
The full coverage of the Yangtze River Green Comprehensive Service Area is another milestone event in the construction of the Yangtze River Green Navigation. The reception and navigation service capacity of the Yangtze River ships have been significantly improved.
According to reports, the water-based green comprehensive service area is an important facility that provides comprehensive production and living services for all kinds of ships and sailors, and helps solve the problems of “urgent, difficult, and hope”.
This time, two water-based green comprehensive service areas in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River were built, integrating life services, production services and government services, focusing on green and environmental protection, and focusing on ship maintenance and ship emergency rescue services, which will make the crew working in the port more efficient and life more convenient.
US Navy's three aircraft carriers gather in the vicinity of China, the most powerful weapons are rare to visit the island of Guam in 2022-01-17, multi-media report: the latest satellite images show that the US Navy's three aircraft carriers are gathering in the vicinity of China, and the most powerful weapons are rare to visit the island of Guam in 2022. The US media also revealed that the most powerful weapons in the US Navy's arsenal are rare to visit the island of Guam, and release important signals to the allies and enemies of the United States in the Indo-Pacific region.
According to the message of the China think tank “South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception Platform”, on January 9, a satellite found the U.S. Navy’s “Carl Vinson” aircraft carrier near the Bab-el-Mandeb Strait.
The Babkak Strait connects the South China Sea and the Sulu Sea, which is a strategic location on the first island chain of the Western Pacific.
The platform is expected to deploy the "Karl von Bismarck" in the South China Sea.
This is the first time the Charles de Gaulle aircraft carrier has deployed F-35C fighter jets and CMV-22 "Seahawk" aircraft.
The U.S. Navy's aircraft carrier, which is currently deployed in the Pacific Ocean, is in addition to the "Carl Vinson" and the "Abraham Lincoln" (USS Abraham Lincoln) which left the United States on January 3.
The Liaoning also carried the first F-35C carrier-based fighter squadron, the 314th Fighter Attack Squadron of the US Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the U.S. Navy currently deployed in the Asia-Pacific region is the “Ronald Reagan” (USS Ronald Reagan) aircraft carrier, which is docked in Yokosuka, Japan.
The battle group also includes the "Shangri-La" missile cruiser and the "Stockdale" missile destroyer.
On January 17, the "South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness Platform" released the latest satellite images, which showed that three US aircraft carriers were gathering in the vicinity of China.
(weibo @South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) On January 17, 2022, the U.S. Navy's CMV-22B transport aircraft flew over the South China Sea.
(Weibo @South China Sea Strategic Situation Perception) According to CNN's report on January 17, the most powerful weapon in the U.S. Navy's arsenal has visited the island of Guam for the first time in a long time.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada (SSN-780) carrying 20 Trident missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads entered the Naval Base Guam on Saturday (Jan. 15).
The U.S. Navy's three aircraft carriers have gathered in the vicinity of China, and the most powerful weapons are rare to visit the island of Guam. The analysis said that this is a signal sent to the allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indo-Pacific region.
This is the first time since 2016 that the U.S. ballistic missile submarine has visited Guam, and it is the second time since the 1980s that it has publicly visited Guam.
The U.S. Navy's three aircraft carriers have gathered in the South China Sea, which is one of the most powerful weapons in recent years. China has built a large number of military facilities in the Spratly Islands in recent years.
The photo is of Yongshui Island in the Nansha Islands.
(South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the visit of the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" to the Philippines further strengthened cooperation between the United States and its allies in the region, demonstrated the United States' capabilities, flexibility, readiness, and commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
A submarine missile is usually called a "Boomer submarine".
The U.S. Navy's 14 "Seawolf" submarines are usually kept secret.
The secret of the submarine-launched ballistic missile made the "Thunderbolt submarine" become the most important survival weapon in the "nuclear three-in-one" system, which also includes the submarine-launched ballistic missile located in the mainland of the United States, and the B-2 and B-52 bombers that can carry nuclear bombs.
Talking to friends about Meta's recent 26% drop and market capitalization evaporation of $25.1 billion, Zuckerberg responded, "Facing unprecedented competition," why?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an advertising company, and its income mainly comes from advertising. Today's profitable advertising companies have their own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, Whatsapp and other functions are all Meta's traffic channels.
Not only that, Meta is the largest “advertising alliance”, and many apps use Meta’s advertising platform to achieve monetization.
But times have changed.
First, because of the adjustment of Apple's privacy policy, Meta is difficult to obtain user data information, which has affected the efficiency of advertising placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is very user-friendly and will clearly prompt the user whether to allow the app to access their information. Most people's normal reaction is to not allow it.
If Google cuts again, the impact on Meta's revenue will be even greater.
Second, the Chinese factor in Meta's revenue growth has weakened (the weight of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is not accurate.
At least 10% of Meta's revenue comes from China each year, mainly from companies that do business in the maritime industry.
Meta has about 100 people in its Hong Kong office, and several dozen in mainland China.
Chinese companies want to expand overseas markets, and Meta is the only advertising channel that cannot be bypassed. Most of the money burned is given to Meta.
Interestingly, TT is now one of Meta's main competitors, but in the past two years, Meta has made a lot of money from TT.
Domestic agents are helping ByteDance to advertise on Meta, and the performance of Meta's Greater China region is also very good.
I haven't specifically looked into it, but I'm sure it won't be better than before.
Chinese companies have already passed the stage of large-scale spending overseas.
Third, the new traffic channel expansion is not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and the new platforms, including TT, are not in Meta's hands.
The biggest problem is not just income decline, but lack of growth expectations.
The capital market is not only looking at income, but also looking at the expectations of the future.
It is obvious that Meta's expectations were not met.
To tell the market a new story, Zuckerberg told "metaverse".
The metaverse is indeed one of the directions of the future, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story should not be able to support the market value of Meta in two years.
So the next two years should be a difficult time for Meta.
Don't look at Facebook's current popularity, it has $100 billion to $200 billion in annual revenue, but in fact, Facebook is currently in a crisis, and there is no good protective wall compared with other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
Although its social software is now quite popular and mainstream, such as Facebook, WhatsApp, etc., but in the face of tiktok's rapid development, facebook does not have much confidence, and it is only a blink of an eye to overturn.
And the concept of metaverse, which is impossible to achieve in a short period of time, is completely without hope, so Facebook is very dangerous, which is why Zuckerberg is changing his name and is constantly looking for new paths, but I think his path is wrong, it is a dead end. These are my thoughts, for reference.
Article 17. The State shall implement a registration and licensing management system for registered fire engineers.
The personnel who have obtained the first- and second-level registered fire safety engineer qualification certificate can practice as a registered fire safety engineer under the name of the registered fire safety engineer.
Article 18 The Public Security Bureau Fire Department is a registration approval department for first-level registered fire engineers.
The provincial, autonomous region, and municipal public security bureaus are the registration and approval departments of the second-level registered fire engineer qualification, and are responsible for the preliminary review of the registration of the first-level registered fire engineer qualification.
Article 19 Persons who have obtained a first-level or second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate and applied for registration should be employed by an approved fire technical service organization or a fire safety key unit and submit the registration application materials to the local public security fire department (for enterprises under the same parent company, submit the registration application materials to the registration address of the parent company) of the employing unit.
Article 20 The public security organs of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government shall, after receiving the registration application materials of the applicant, notify the applicant in person or within 5 working days to inform the applicant of all the contents that need to be corrected, if the application materials are incomplete or do not conform to the prescribed form. If the applicant is not notified within the specified time, it shall be deemed to have received the application materials.
For the registration application accepted or rejected, a written certificate with the seal of the fire department of the local public security bureau and the date should be issued.
From the date of receipt of the application for registration of the first-level registered firefighter qualification and the second-level registered firefighter qualification, the public security organ of the province, autonomous region and the directly administered city shall complete the preliminary review of the application materials for the registration of the first-level registered firefighter qualification and the registration of the second-level registered firefighter qualification according to the prescribed conditions and procedures, and submit the application materials for the registration of the first-level registered firefighter qualification and the preliminary review opinions to the Public Security Bureau of the province, autonomous region and the directly administered city for approval.
The Public Security Bureau should make a decision within 20 working days whether to approve or reject the application materials and preliminary review opinions submitted by the provincial public security organs.
If a decision cannot be made within the specified period of time, the applicant should be informed of the extension of the period and the reasons.
For decisions that are not approved, a written explanation should be provided, and the applicant should be informed of the right to appeal to the Administrative Review Board or to file an action in the Administrative Court.
Article 22. The registration approval department shall issue and deliver the registration certificate of the corresponding level within 10 working days from the date of approval.
Article 23. The registration certificate shall be valid for three years.
The registration certificate is a professional certificate of the registered fire safety engineer, which is kept and used by the registered fire safety engineer himself within the validity period.
Article 24. Applicants for initial registration shall submit their applications within one year from the date of obtaining the first and second registration certificates of the fire protection engineer.
Applicants must meet the continuing education requirements when applying for initial registration.
The specific methods of registration management, including initial registration, continued registration, change of registration, cancellation of registration and non-registration, shall be specified by the Ministry of Public Security.
Section 25. Continuing education is a prerequisite for renewal, re-registration and late initial registration of registered fire engineers.
Each level of registered fire engineer should complete the required continuing education within the period of registration.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall timely announce the registration of fire engineers in the society, establish a register of fire engineers, and implement credit management of their professional activities.
Article 27 The registration management departments of each level should strictly implement the provisions of the Administrative License Law of the People's Republic of China.
The exam information shared today will end here. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the exam and try to pass the fire engineer exam as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of financial/business/construction latest exam information.
I cancelled... I waited for a long time.
You keep postponing.
But the whole pot of chicken soup is raw meat, so it can't be eaten. Can I get a refund?
There were no pineapples, eggs, or steamed buns, and #PRS_ORG# withdrew #NUMBER# yuan.
But is water chicken refundable?
Because they couldn't eat.
Can I cancel if I want to?
The joint exercise “Peace Rescue - 2021” of the Chinese and Vietnamese armies ended successfully - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi, December 12 (Zhou Na, Teng Huijian) On the morning of December 12, all the participating units of the Chinese contingent in the joint exercise "Peace Rescue - 2021" held by the two armies of China and Vietnam completed the safe return to China's Guangxi, marking the successful completion of the 7-day training mission.
This joint exercise successfully completed the tasks of joint command, joint on-site rescue and mass casualty treatment according to the standard of battlefield simulation, and effectively improved the two armies' medical rescue capability.
The results of the exercise were praised by both the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
The commander of the Vietnam People's Army's Training Command, Deputy Director of the Logistics Department of the Vietnam People's Army and Deputy Commander of the Vietnam People's Army, Nguyen Xuan Sheng, said at the closing ceremony of the exercise that through this exercise, Vietnam's military doctors learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and supporting equipment of the Chinese side.
The results of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the two countries' military medical forces in medical assistance and epidemic prevention and control.
Chen Chunming, deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, said that the exercise was based on the success of the 2018 joint medical service activities, and it has great significance as a milestone.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing, rapid nucleic acid detection instruments and other health and epidemic prevention supplies to the Vietnam People's Army.
